


Gracia Martore - Wikipedia



















 







Gracia Martore

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

Gracia C. Martore is the president and CEO of Tegna, Inc., and was CEO of the predecessor Gannett Company before its split. She replaced Craig Dubow on 6 October 2011.[1] She serves on the Board of Directors of FM Global and MeadWestvaco Corporation.
Education and early career
Martore graduated from Wellesley College in 1973 with a double major in history and political science. While at Wellesley she was named a Scholar for academic excellence.She worked for 12 years in the banking industry before joining Gannett. In 2010 Ms. Martore's total compensation was estimated by Forbes to be over eight million dollars.[2]
Awards
In a 2011 review of the world’s most powerful women Martore was cited by Forbes. She was also named one of Washington’s 100 Most Powerful Women by Washingtonian Magazine. Institutional Investor magazine named her one of the best CFOs in America and ranked her the Best CFO in America in the publishing and advertising agencies category for three years in a row (2004, 2005 and 2006). The Washington Post named her one of the top 10 female executives at major companies in the Washington region. In 2006 she was named CFO of the Year by Virginia Business.[3]
References

^ USA Today, 7 October 2011
^ Gracia Martore - Forbes
^ Leadership Team | Tegna.com



Preceded by
Craig Dubow
Gannett Corporation CEO
2011-2015
Succeeded by
Bob Dickey








v
t
e


Gannett Company



Directors:



Full list of directors





National assets



USA Today

The Big Lead
MMAjunkie.com
Sports Weekly














v
t
e


Gannett Company regional daily newspapers in the United States






Abilene Reporter-News
The Advocate
Anderson Independent-Mail
Alamogordo Daily News
Argus Leader
The Arizona Republic
Asbury Park Press
Asheville Citizen-Times
Battle Creek Enquirer
The Baxter Bulletin
The Burlington Free Press
Carlsbad Current-Argus
Chillicothe Gazette
The Cincinnati Enquirer
The Clarion-Ledger
Commercial Appeal
Corpus Christi Caller-Times
Coshocton Tribune
The Courier-Journal
Courier News
Courier-Post
The Daily Advertiser
The Daily Journal
The Daily News Journal
Daily Record
The Daily Times (Farmington)
The Daily Times (Salisbury)
Daily World
Deming Headlight
Democrat and Chronicle
The Des Moines Register
The Desert Sun
Detroit Free Press
El Paso Times
Evansville Courier & Press
The Evening Sun
Florida Today
Fort Collins Coloradoan
Fort Myers News-Press
Great Falls Tribune
Green Bay Press-Gazette
The Greenville News
Hattiesburg American
Henderson Gleaner
Herald Times Reporter
Home News Tribune
The Indianapolis Star
Iowa City Press-Citizen
The Ithaca Journal
The Jackson Sun
Journal & Courier
The Journal News
Kitsap Sun
Knoxville News Sentinel
Lancaster Eagle-Gazette
Lansing State Journal
Las Cruces Sun-News
The Leaf-Chronicle
Lebanon Daily News
Mansfield News Journal
The Marion Star
Marshfield News-Herald
Milwaukee Journal Sentinel

CNI Community Newspapers


Montgomery Advertiser
Naples Daily News
News Herald
The News Leader
The News Journal
The News-Messenger
The News-Star
Oshkosh Northwestern
Pacific Daily News
Palladium-Item
Pensacola News Journal
Port Huron Times Herald
The Post-Crescent
Poughkeepsie Journal
Press & Sun-Bulletin
Public Opinion
Redding Record Searchlight
Reno Gazette-Journal
The Reporter
St. Cloud Times
The Salinas Californian
San Angelo Standard-Times
The Sheboygan Press
Silver City Sun News
The Spectrum
Springfield News-Leader
Star-Gazette
The Star Press
Statesman Journal
Stevens Point Journal
Stuart News
Telegraph-Forum
The Tennessean
The Times
Times Herald
Times Record News
Times Recorder
The Town Talk
Treasure Coast Newspapers
Tulare Advance-Register
Ventura County Star
Vero Beach Press Journal
Visalia Times-Delta
Wausau Daily Herald
Wisconsin Rapids Daily Tribune
York Daily Record















v
t
e


Newsquest daily newspapers in the United Kingdom






The Argus, Brighton
The Bolton News
Telegraph & Argus, Bradford
Evening Gazette, Colchester
Bournemouth Daily Echo
Dorset Echo
Echo, Basildon, Essex
Evening Times
Greenock Telegraph
The Herald, Glasgow
News Shopper, South East London & North West Kent
Lancashire Telegraph
Oxford Mail
The National, Scotland
The Northern Echo
The Press, York
Southern Daily Echo, Southampton
South Wales Argus
Swindon Advertiser
Worcester News












This article about a chief executive from the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.


v
t
e









 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Gracia_Martore&oldid=789685835"					
Categories: Living peopleAmerican chairmen of corporations20th-century American businesspeopleAmerican media executivesAmerican corporate directorsAmerican chief financial officersGannett peopleAmerican women chief executivesWomen corporate directors21st-century American businesspeopleWellesley College alumniAmerican bankersWomen bankersWomen chief financial officersAmerican chief executive stubsHidden categories: Wikipedia indefinitely semi-protected biographies of living peopleAll stub articles 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
View source
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 8 July 2017, at 22:24.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 






Leadership TeamLeadership TeamBob DickeyChief Executive OfficerMaribel WadsworthChief Transformation OfficerAlison EngelChief Financial OfficerBarbara WallChief Legal OfficerJohn ZidichPresident of Domestic PublishingJamshid KhazenieChief Technology OfficerAndy YostChief Marketing OfficerHenry Faure WalkerChief Executive Officer, Newsquest Media GroupDavid HarmonChief People OfficerKevin GentzelChief Revenue OfficerJoanne LipmanChief Content OfficerAmber AllmanVP, Corporate Events & CommunicationAlex MezaVP, Corporate Development





















 



 Gracia Martore Joins Omnicom’s Board of Directors 
         










    










 













 











 



















Gracia Martore Joins Omnicom's Board of Directors
        																																																								
              

          Joins Deborah Kissire and Valerie Williams as part of Omnicom's Board Refreshment
        











 News provided by
Omnicom Group  
Jul 18, 2017, 09:00 ET









 Share this article




























































NEW YORK, July 18, 2017 /PRNewswire/ -- The Board of Directors of Omnicom Group Inc. (NYSE:    OMC) today announced the appointment of Gracia Martore as an independent director, effective immediately. Ms. Martore recently retired as President and CEO of TEGNA Inc. (NYSE:   TGNA), formerly known as Gannett Co. 
Ms. Martore's appointment expands the Board to 13 directors, 11 of whom are independent. She will be a member of the audit committee. 










 







							 		Gracia Martore
							  



 

 
 



"We conducted an exhaustive search for someone who would further strengthen our board's breadth of talent and background, and we are delighted to have identified such an outstanding leader," said Bruce Crawford, Chairman of the Omnicom Board of Directors. "Gracia's expertise in business transformation, as well as running a leading media company, will be of great benefit to Omnicom." 
Ms. Martore, 65, served as CEO, TEGNA Inc., the nation's largest local media company since 2011. She stepped down last May as part of the company's spin off of Cars.com, the top online destination for the digital automotive marketplace. Ms. Martore held various leadership roles over her 30-year career at both TEGNA and the Gannett Company, including Chief Financial Officer before being named CEO. Prior to joining Gannett, she worked for 12 years in the banking industry.
Ms. Martore serves on the Boards of Directors of The Associated Press, FM Global, United Rentals and WestRock Company. Ms. Martore is a graduate of Wellesley College where she was a Wellesley Scholar. She is also a member of Wellesley College's Board of Trustees.
Ms. Martore now joins Debbie Kissire and Valerie Williams who have been appointed to the Board since the Company began its Board Refreshment process in early 2016.  Since then, three long-serving board members have stepped down.  The company continues to take meaningful steps towards adding Board members with a wealth of experience and diverse points of view.
"As a former Fortune 500 CEO, Gracia knows how important it is for corporations today to be diverse in every aspect and we are thrilled to welcome her as Omnicom's newest independent director," said John Wren, President and CEO, Omnicom Group. "Our commitment to a diverse and inclusive workforce starts at the top with Omnicom's independent Board of Directors now including six women and three African Americans. I look forward to working with this outstanding group as we enter our third decade as a leader in the marketing and communications business."
About Omnicom Group Inc.
Omnicom Group (www.omnicomgroup.com) is a leading global marketing and corporate communications company.  Omnicom's branded networks and numerous specialty firms provide advertising, strategic media planning and buying, digital and interactive marketing, direct and promotional marketing, public relations and other specialty communications services to over 5,000 clients in more than 100 countries. Follow us on Twitter for the latest news.
View original content with multimedia:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/gracia-martore-joins-omnicoms-board-of-directors-300489695.html
SOURCE Omnicom Group
 Related Links

http://www.omnicomgroup.com



 












Jul 20, 2017, 06:40 ET
Preview: Omnicom Group Reports Second Quarter and Year-to-Date 2017 Results













Jul 13, 2017, 18:26 ET
Preview: Omnicom Group Inc. Declares Dividend






My News


  Release contains wide tables.	  View fullscreen.






 Also from this source




 

Jul 20, 2017, 06:40 ET
                                  				                                                                                     
                              Omnicom Group Reports Second Quarter and Year-to-Date 2017 Results








 

Jul 13, 2017, 18:26 ET
                                  				                                                                                     
                              Omnicom Group Inc. Declares Dividend





 Explore
 More news releases in similar topics

  Advertising
Personnel Announcements








 You just read:
Gracia Martore Joins Omnicom's Board of Directors


 News provided by
Omnicom Group  
Jul 18, 2017, 09:00 ET








 Share this article









































 











Looking to send a news release with PR Newswire?
Take advantage of the world's leading distribution platform.
Sign up to get started
Request more information
Have an account? Log In

















Search











Searching for your content...









Advanced Search












































 


TEGNA's (TGNA) CEO Gracia Martore on Q4 2016 Results - Earnings Call Transcript | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»TEGNA's (TGNA) CEO Gracia Martore on Q4 2016 Results - Earnings Call TranscriptFeb.27.17 | About: TEGNA (TGNA) Start Time: 10:00
End Time: 10:59
TEGNA Inc. (NYSE:TGNA)
Q4 2016 Earnings Conference Call
February 27, 2017, 10:00 AM ET
Executives
Gracia C. Martore - President and CEO
Victoria Dux Harker - CFO and EVP
David T. Lougee - President, TEGNA Media
Alex Vetter - President and CEO, Cars.com LLC
Matthew W. Ferguson - CEO, CareerBuilder LLC
John A. Williams - President, Digital Ventures
Jeffrey Heinz - VP of IR
Analysts
Barton Crockett - FBR Capital Markets
Alexia Quadrani - JPMorgan
Douglas Arthur - Huber Research
Kyle Evans - Stephens, Inc.
Marci Ryvicker - Wells Fargo
Dan Kurnos - The Benchmark Co.
James Goss - Barrington Research
Operator
Good day, and welcome to the TEGNA Fourth Quarter 2016 Earnings Conference Call. This call is being recorded. Our speaker for today will be Gracia Martore, President and Chief Executive Officer; and Victoria Harker, Chief Financial Officer.
At this time, I would like to turn the call over to Mr. Jeff Heinz, Vice President, Investor Relations. Please go ahead, sir.
Jeffrey Heinz
Thank you. Good morning and welcome to our earnings call and webcast. Today, our President and CEO, Gracia Martore; our CFO, Victoria Harker, and members of our leadership team will review TEGNA's fourth quarter and year-end 2016 results. After that, we'll open up the call for questions.
Hopefully, you've had the opportunity to review this morning's press release. If you have not yet seen a copy of the release, it's available at tegna.com.
Before we get started, I'd like to remind you that this conference call and webcast include forward-looking statements and our actual results may differ. Factors that may cause them to differ are outlined in our SEC filings.
This presentation also includes certain non-GAAP financial measures. We've provided reconciliations of those measures to the most directly comparable GAAP measures in the press release and on the Investor Relations portion of our Web site.
With that, I’ll turn the call to Gracia.
Gracia C. Martore
Thanks, Jeff, and let me join Jeff in welcoming all of you to our fourth quarter and year-end earnings call. Now I’m going to kick things off with highlights of our performance for the full year and also for the fourth quarter.
And after that, I’m going to turn it over to Dave Lougee, President of TEGNA Media; and Alex Vetter, our CEO of Cars.com for a deeper dive on their respective businesses. Victoria will then cover the financial highlights for the quarter. So lots to cover, so let’s get right to it.
We remain focused on our anticipated spin-off Cars.com which will create key strong companies with leadership positions in their respective industries. Alex and the team there continue to make progress in their preparations for life as a separate company later this year.
Our strategic review process for CareerBuilder results are moving along. We are confident that we along with our partners TEGNA Media and McCarthy will find a solution that maximizes value for shareholders and puts CareerBuilder in the best position to succeed for its customers and its employees.
So now let’s turn to our record performance for 2016, which was more than consistent with what we shared with you in early December. We closed out the year with substantial improvement on both the top line and bottom line, as compared to 2015, with revenue up 10% and non-GAAP earnings per share increasing 62% year-over-year to $0.74. And we generated a substantial increase in adjusted EBITDA, which was 1.23 billion. These improved results reflect solid performance across our segments, as they continue to execute on their growth plans and strategic initiatives.
2016 was a strong year for TEGNA Media. TEGNA Media revenue was at record levels driven by political spending, continued digital growth, the Summer Olympics which aired across our robust NBC footprint and substantial increases in retransmission fees, which were up about 30% in '16 compared to the prior year. On the TEGNA Digital side, 2016 revenues were up about 3% reflecting growth of Cars.com and CareerBuilder.

Before we turn to fourth quarter performance, we want to also note that with the change we made last year to go to a calendar year, 2016’s fourth quarter was three days shorter than the 2015 fourth quarter. So you’ll want to make sure you are viewing our quarterly comps for Media through that lens. Fortunately, there will be no issues like this going forward.
In the fourth quarter, TEGNA Media revenues were up 17% over the prior year’s quarter excluding the three extra days in last year’s fourth quarter. We saw strong growth in congressional and gubernatorial election spending thanks to our well-positioned station footprint. These races brought in more advertising dollars this year than during the 2012 election and helped to partially offset the well-documented lower Presidential race spending. Dave will be providing a full report on our political results in a moment.
We also are very pleased with retransmission growth of over $25 million in the fourth quarter. In addition, our team made excellent progress negotiating new agreements replacing those that expired at the end of '16, which will drive growth in '17 and beyond. Now we continue to see a gap in the retransmission revenue we take in compared to the value we provide, and we have been closing that gap for the last several quarters and will continue to work hard on that front.
We also recognize that 2017 is a unique year for us, in that we have a gap between the increase in retransmission fees we earn and the increase in reversed compensation this year. As we have noted, we plan to close that gap both with the new agreements we negotiated at year end, and Dave will share some good news on that front in a few moments, as well as the initiatives we launched in 2016, which combined were more than offset this exposure.
Turning to Digital, Digital segment revenue rose during the fourth quarter reflecting the mid-single digit revenue growth at Cars.com and CareerBuilder. These gains were unfavorably impacted by lost revenue as a result of our sale of the PointRoll business in November of last year.
Auto remains one of the fastest growing advertising verticals and we continue to see more and more marketing and advertising dollars shifting to a digital solution. To capitalize on these expanding opportunities, Cars.com is rolling out new products, new apps, a more user-friendly interface that provides unique value to dealers and shoppers alike.
Cars’ strong brand recognition and leadership position coupled with favorable industry dynamics and continued hard work and innovation by the Cars.com team gives us confidence that it is positioned to reach its full potential as a standalone company. Alex will provide a deep dive on the specific initiatives underway in just a few moments.
2016 was a pivotal year for CareerBuilder. CareerBuilder is one of the most innovative companies in the human capital space with an unmatched end-to-end platform. For more than two decades, CareerBuilder has led in recruitment with its terrific pre-hire platform. Now with its recent acquisition of Workterra specializing in cloud-based benefits administration and talent management, CareerBuilder has moved into post-hire solutions.
Employers appreciate the expanded suite of services we now provide under one umbrella, and we too are optimistic about the new doors and revenue growth opportunities these value-add services open up for us. The breadth and depth of CareerBuilder solutions make the company a true human resources powerhouse.
Lastly, I want to comment briefly on our share buyback program. As you saw in November, we reactivated the program which had been temporarily suspended in connection with our anticipated spin-off of Cars.com. Our decision to begin buybacks again was based on our strong operational and financial performance and the Board’s confidence in our ability to maintain strong cash flow levels and allocate capital strategically. We will continue to be opportunistic regarding share repurchases going forward.

Now, let me turn it over to Dave for his thoughts on TEGNA Media.
David T. Lougee
Thank you, Gracia. As we had forecasted, 2016 was a year of records. We had a record year for both revenue and EBITDA and our stations outperformed our markets producing a record revenue share for our division, demonstrating that our sales and content plans are working. Our focus on investment and innovation has been key to that growth. I’ll leave the reporting of the numbers to Victoria but let me start with retransmission that Gracia referenced.
So very good news to start 2017. We have stronger than projected retrans revenues due to stronger results and those year-end negotiations that covered 42% of our subscribers. I’m pleased to report the resetting of rates that Gracia referenced in her remarks will result in a 24% increase for retrans revenues in 2017, higher than the range of 17% to 21% previously reported.
As a reminder, as Gracia also referenced, on the expense side of the retrans equation, we’re now making reverse compensation payments for the first time on 11 of our NBC stations.
We had most recently projected a one-time net retrans gap in 2017 of $48 million to $55 million. But now I’m pleased to say based on those year-end negotiations that gap has been reduced to $25 million to $30 million. And as we planned, our innovation initiatives which I’ll discuss in more detail shortly will more than cover that remaining net retrans gap.
Back to retransmission on the topic of pay-TV subscribers. New OTT providers, as we’ve talked about in the past, have shown great interest in our portfolio of strong stations. We’re in pretty much the final stages now of very productive negotiations with our network partners and OTT providers, some of them new OTT providers also known as virtual MVPDs, which we’ll talk about in the future always as VMVPDs only maybe if I can say it right.
Given the strength of our stations and the size of our markets, we’re ending up with very good economics on these agreements which will result in no lost income if a subscriber moves from a traditional MVPD to one of those new players. Furthermore, some of these services are targeting so-called cord-nevers with skinny bundles of channels at lower overall prices, and that’s an opportunity for us to reach new consumers who have not yet before been in the pay-TV ecosystem.
Now onto the regulatory front. We expect a long overdue break in the log jam on outdated TV ownership rules this year. Under new FCC Chairman Ajit Pai, we see very positive signs of relief that will likely allow both vertical and horizontal consolidations of very good and overdue development for TEGNA and the industry overall.
And just last week, the FCC gave approval to broadcasters to broadcast in our new ATSC 3.0 standard, which provides additional business opportunities down the road, another good development for the industry and TEGNA. And regarding the just concluded spectrum option, as expected, TEGNA did not sell any spectrum in the option.
Now let me turn to political and quickly recap political in the fourth quarter. We finished at 91 million, higher than our previous guidance of 88 million to 90 million. While we know Presidential spending was down from prior elections, notably Senate spending was nearly flat and House races were up 20% and Governor’s race is up 138% from 2012.
Looking ahead to 2018, the current political energy and activism that you’re all aware of alive in this country will likely result in heavy fund raising and political spending by midterm election standards, so we expect a healthy year for political next year.
Now let me turn to our many innovation initiatives that we’re using to reinvent our business; innovations like Hatch, our centralized marketing solutions group combined with our new pricing and business intelligence team, a comprehensive content innovation plan, and Premion, our newly launched over-the-top advertising services business, are all positively impacting our clients and advancing the way we meet our consumers' and customers' needs.

Premion has expanded its business and is ramping up very nicely. Local and regional advertisers recognize the importance of over-the-top video content distribution and are taking nicely to Premion’s position as a one-stop-shop in OTT advertising.
In January alone, we have 135% more campaigns than we did in December. The interest from advertisers is real and it continues to grow each month. These campaigns has spanned from 1 to 125 markets, in other words we’re selling way outside our footprint. And in the 38 TEGNA markets, 30 properties have booked more than 300 total campaigns already in 2017.
And finally, Premion is also onboarding new distribution partners, including Turner, FireCom [ph] and Major League Baseball. With these additions, we now have more than 10 major content and broadcast partners who provide access to over 80 long-form episodic branded networks.
Hatch also is off to a strong start in 2017. As a result of Hatch creating unique multiplatform campaigns for local marketers, we have 125 new accounts we didn’t have a year ago. So the pipeline for potential business is strong and we’re optimistic on the prospect for developing new revenue throughout the year.
Now to content. To achieve [ph] the audience share increases and deeper engagement on all platforms that we’re getting, we’re breaking our teams from the assembly line of formulaic local news production and investing in unique, originable, shareable content and pilots that will stand out amongst consumers.
We’ve introduced the concept to our teams, brought in a lot of new innovative leaders to the company and we launched the first test in the marketplace on the air in November and evaluated our results. Despite competition from the World’s Series strong competition and the election in November, we saw share increases across 15 stations in the morning and 11 stations in late news. And it’s important to know there’s often a 6 to 12-month lag between audience share growth and revenue impacts.
On the programming side, our commitment to having more control of our content within any programming that focuses on live and local is also producing results. We currently have two local or regional pilots in production and now two national shows out-to-market for distribution. TEGNA was a featured company earlier this year at the National Association of Television Producers and Executives, also known as NATPE.
Our announcement of the show that Gracia referenced, a first of its kind, daily live and online program, has received great response. We’re in the process of setting up stations now. Produced out of our Denver affiliates with a low production costs, this live show will be live across several time zones each weekday leveraging social media content and an entertaining ensemble cast to create a live experience unlike other syndicating shows on broadcast TV. We have a partner in MGM Studios under President Mark Burnett of The Apprentice.
So those are just a few examples of the bold and aggressive moves TEGNA Media is making. Our focus on innovation has become a competitive advantage and in 2016 you can expect more. In 2018, we’ll be able to take these initiatives and leverage an incredible opportunity to showcase our content and revenue initiatives with The Super Bowl and The Olympics on all our many NBC stations in next year’s first quarter.
With that, I want to turn it over to my partner, Alex Vetter, at Cars.com.
Alex Vetter
Thank you, Dave. For the fourth quarter of 2016, we achieved 162 million in total revenue, a 5% increase compared to the fourth quarter last year primarily due to continued growth in our retail channels. Retail revenue, which includes our local dealer and national advertising businesses, was up 7.5% year-over-year. With our revenue growth, we achieved strong EBITDA and EBITDA margins which we believe are among the highest in the market.

Our largest revenue gains were with auto manufacturers and major dealer chains where we saw 13% growth in the quarter compared to last year. These customers have higher and larger resources and therefore are able to apply a more sophisticated approach to measuring marketing effectiveness. Further, they are already focused on offline sales beyond digital generation of traditional leads.
Our total wholesale revenue from affiliate newspapers and broadcasters was down 3% in the quarter versus last year. We’re continuing to work with our affiliate partners to improve their performance, and in certain cases restructure our relationships.
At the start of 2017, we took control of certain territories from one affiliate partner, an important first step in a transition that will provide Cars.com even greater opportunities to gain market share at the same time convert losses in our wholesale channel to retail revenue gains within our retail system.
On the local sales level with our broad network of dealers, while we continue to take a leadership role in the industry providing value beyond traditional leads, we are experiencing softer revenue. As a reminder, the fourth quarter is typically the slowest quarter for the company due to the seasonality of the automotive market.
The overall softness in local dealer business is primarily attributable to two factors; traffic declines during the replatforming of the Cars.com technology and the shift of the consumer to mobile devices. The replatforming of our Cars.com technology which is an important strategic initiative in 2016 provides us with a much more flexible and robust technology infrastructure.
We’ve modernized our entire code base to allow us to develop products and features much faster. For example, our legacy platform, we made two and a half changes per month on average. With our new technology platform, we’re now tracking towards more than 60 new innovative updates per month.
Further, as we discussed on the last earnings call, our traffic and search engine position were negatively impacted during the replatforming work. And as we said, it will take us some time to regain our SAR [ph] position, which will in turn further increase the quality of traffic and leads we’re able to deliver to our local partners.
The good news is that I’m confident on the work we’re undertaking, because part of that confidence is based on our shift to and strength in mobile. Our move to the responsive design allows consumers to experience our site regardless of the device they’re using. Our much improved site speed is also contributed to our growth in mobile with our fourth quarter mobile app traffic up 13% year-over-year.
Mobile users are more likely to be repeat visitors and our site data supports this. We saw a 10% increase in our repeat visits compared to the same quarter last year. And while mobile users are typically sending fewer leads to dealers, the mobile user is typically much closer to a sale.
We’ve been tracking and analyzing mobile walk-in behavior on the dealer lot for more than a year through our innovative Lot Insights reports, which was the first of its kind for our industry. And our reporting has revealed that when we factor in Cars.com mobile traffic, we believe that we’re generating nearly 7 million more fiscal leads per year that are not consistently recognized within the industry.
Further, related to product innovation, we continue to focus on improving the consumer experience with innovative app features such as Price Drop Alerts, On-the-Lot VIN Scanning, as well as Urgency Indicators on the site that provide real-time metrics on a given vehicle’s interest to shoppers.
We’re also encouraged by the early results from our acquisition of DealerRater which has positioned us as the largest automotive review platform in the industry. Last quarter, we incorporated more than 3 million dealer reviews into the Cars.com Web site. And research shows that consumers trust reviews nearly as much as personal recommendations. And we’ve emerged as the go-to-resource for unbiased automotive opinions which we expect will translate into increased site traffic.

In addition, DealerRater takes reviews one step further by allowing consumers to review individual employees within the dealership. Our data shows that nearly 80% of DealerRater sales people indicate their employee profiles help them sell more cars and drive more showroom visits.
We told you last quarter that we were awarded the J.D. Power’s highest ranking for overall satisfaction among third-party Automotive Mobile Web sites and the accolades keep coming for our work and our culture. For the fourth consecutive year, Cars.com was named the top review site and Digital Air Strike's Sixth Annual Automotive Social Media Trends study. We also received the Highest Rated Used Car Advertising Award in the eighth annual DrivingSales Dealer Satisfaction Awards.
Now before I turn it over to Victoria, I’d like to make a few comments on our outlook. We are expecting modest single digit total revenue growth in the first quarter. We expect to see revenue growth in our national and major accounts businesses but at a lower rate than during the same quarter last year, primarily related to reduction in spending at two national accounts due to a transition to an advertising agency and a change in placement strategy during the first quarter.
Once these transitions are completed, we expect these manufacturers to increase their spending as we progress throughout the year. Excluding the impact of these two accounts, we expect our national and major accounts to be up in the 12% to 15% range in the quarter in line with the fourth quarter growth rate.
As I noted before, while we’re taking steps to improve and in some cases restructure the relationships with our affiliates, we expect a mid-single digit decline year-over-year in this part of our business.
At the local sales level, as we’ve discussed, it will take time to grow our increase in SEO traffic and the quality of traffic to our dealers. And as that traffic grows, we will be working to influence the industry to adopt new lead generation metrics that matter for today’s consumers, namely the majority of those who made the shift to mobile.
On the industry front, although analysts at this point in the year have mixed views on the SAR, auto sales are expected to remain at an all-time high and dealer profitability levels continue to be very strong. Thank you.
Now I’ll turn it over to Victoria for further comments.
Victoria Dux Harker
Thanks, Alex, and good morning, everyone. As Gracia has already mentioned, 2016 was a solid year for TEGNA by almost every measure and we’re very pleased with our fourth quarter results reflected in double-digit growth in both revenues and adjusted EBITDA.
Before we dive into our consolidated financial results as well as capital allocation during the quarter, I’d like to highlight a few special items which unfavorably impacted operating expenses by about $19 million on a pre-tax basis with an associated EPS impact of $0.05 per share. These are primarily driven by non-cash impairment charges and severance charges, largely due to our recent reorganization at our G/O Digital business.
Beyond this, we recognized about $11 million in non-operating special items on a pre-tax basis with an associated unfavorable EPS impact of $0.09 per share related to the anticipated Cars.com spin-off and the sale of additional business. During the quarter, we also report a special tax benefit resulting from deferred compensation investments with an EPS benefit of $0.02 per share.
As Gracia mentioned, a conversion to a calendar year after the spin-off of republishing assets in 2015 resulted in three fewer days in this year’s comparable fourth quarter results impacting the media segment revenue by about $11 million and adjusted EBITDA by about $7 million. Despite this impact with solid performances by both media and digital segments, we achieved earnings per share of $0.74, an increase of 40% over last year.

Now turning to the fourth quarter consolidated financial results. Total company revenues of $887 million were up over 10% year-over-year driven by a record media segment revenue and gains across our digital businesses.
During the quarter, total company operating expenses of $589 million were 7% higher compared to last year, driven by higher programming fees as well as expenses associated with solid revenue growth and ongoing investments in media segment initiatives. These were partially offset by the absence of PointRoll business on a comparative basis.
As a result of the solid operational execution across the segment, TEGNA overall achieved strong adjusted EBITDA of $350 million this quarter, up 15% year-over-year and our adjusted EBITDA margin was 39%, up 160 basis points compared to last year. We’re also very pleased that the EPS outperformance during the quarter was about half from the benefit of tax rate and half from operational performance.
Now, let’s turn to a more detailed review of the media and digital segment results. Media segment revenues of $529 million increased by 14% year-over-year, driven by strong retransmission revenue and higher political advertising spending as well as continued growth in digital revenue. Excluding the impact of the calendar change, media segment revenue was up 17% in line with our guidance.
Retransmission revenue was up 21%, an anticipated growth rate lower than prior quarters due to lapping of the agreements negotiated during the fourth quarter of 2015. For the year, retransmission revenue was up significantly, about 30% over last year. Beyond this, media segment digital advertising revenues continued to increase, up by about 7%, driven by continued gains in digital marketing services and the success of our recently launched initiatives.
Now focusing on first quarter 2017 expectations. Based on current trends, we anticipate total media segment revenue to be flat to slightly above the first quarter of last year. The year-over-year comparison will naturally be unfavorably impacted by about $16 million due to substantially lower political advertising revenue.
It’s also approximately $9 million less due to the move of the Super Bowl from our 11 CBS stations which reach about 10.6 million or nearly 9.5% of U.S. households to our much smaller three FOX stations footprint which reach only about 600,000 or one half of 1% of U.S. households. Excluding the unfavorable impact of the Super Bowl shift and lower political advertising, media segment revenues is expected to be up in the mid-single digits year-over-year.
During the fourth quarter, media segment operating expenses of $285 million were up 12% year-over-year primarily due to increased programming fees. Excluding these fees, media segment expenses increased approximately 3.5% driven by investments in our strategic initiatives including sales and content transformation projects.
During the quarter, digital segment revenues of $358 million increased by 4% year-over-year. On a constant currency basis and adjusting for PointRoll, digital segment revenues were up by about 6% over last year reflecting higher revenue within Cars.com and CareerBuilder.
Cars.com revenues increased by 5% during the fourth quarter reflecting increased market penetration in direct markets, the recent DealerRater acquisition and strong national display advertising. Wholesale revenue was slightly down compared to last year with mixed performance by affiliates. Cars.com revenues sold to the direct sales channels was up over 7% reflecting the factors Alex mentioned earlier.
CareerBuilder revenues were up by about 7% year-over-year on a constant currency basis with significant improvement sequentially. Growth was mainly due to higher resume data base revenue, continued sales momentum of Software-as-a-Service solution and several recent acquisitions, partially offset by continued headwinds in the job posting business.

Digital segment operating expenses of $289 million were up 4% reflecting investments in growth initiatives and the expenses allocated with the newly acquired businesses within both Cars.com and CareerBuilder, partially offset by the absence of expenses at PointRoll.
Now turning to CapEx. Capital investments of $26 million during the quarter reflects our ongoing commitment to reinvest in business priorities and digital development as well as media content, product integration and platform enhancements. For the year, our capital investments totaled $95 million just slightly above our full year target due to additional investments in software development.
Turning now to capital allocation. After a brief pause in the share repurchase program following the announcement of the intended Cars.com spin-off, we resumed the repurchases on a limited basis in November. Since the reactivation, approximately 0.5 million shares repurchased during the fourth quarter at an average price per share of $22.05 for a total of $11 million.
At the end of the quarter, our long-term debt stood at $4 billion reflecting the extinguishment of $193 million in 10% senior notes which reached their maturity earlier in 2016. Beyond this, in November we accelerated the redemption of the outstanding $70 million remaining on our 7.125 notes at par which were due to mature in September of 2018.
As we mentioned during our previous call, both these actions will result in significant interest expense savings of $14 million annually, approximately $5 million over two years respectively. At the end of the quarter, cash on the balance sheet was $77 million and free cash flow for the quarter was $202 million.
With that, we will now open it up for questions.
Question-and-Answer Session
Operator
[Operator Instructions]. We’ll take our first question from Barton Crockett with FBR Capital Markets.
Barton Crockett
Okay, great. Thanks for taking the question and I appreciate some of your thoughts about the regulatory situation under the new FCC leadership. But I was wondering if you could expand a little bit on that. I think you said that you see opportunities for more horizontal and vertical combinations. I was wondering if you could be a little bit more specific about what the constraints are that you think could be changed in how TEGNA will try and be positioned for that.
David T. Lougee
Sure. This is Dave. I’ll take that. Just starting with the vertical, there’s been a longstanding UHF discount for stations that’s been frozen effectively recently and we expect that to be reinstated probably within the next couple of months, as the FCC appropriately is looking at that. They should view it holistically with all the ownership rules. And then as or even more importantly I think possibly by as early as the end of the summer or early in the fall, the FCC under new FCC Chairman Ajit Pai who’s been very public in the past about the need for these outdated rules to be updated, we expect him to take action. He does not need to do for those of you familiar with the so-called Quadrennial Review that the FCC is supposed to do every four years. While the next one is scheduled for '18, he’s already got a petition for reconsideration in front of him of the last ones that the previous FCC did. So all the filings have been done. The process is fairly simple and clean for him to reinstate them – to relax them. And specifically what we mean by those in-market rules are there’s a number of old rules that really limit our ability to consolidate in the marketplaces, specifically I’ll call out probably the two most important which is there’s an eight-voices test where you have to have eight independent owners in a market again from a buy point here [ph]. And two, that you can’t own two of the big four stations in a marketplace as determined by ratings technically. And that made sense once upon a time obviously when broadcasting before the Internet was here, before video was here, before cable had grown. But I think the time has come and he’s got control of the commission and we have a pretty high level of confidence that those rules will change. We’ll also need for the Department of Justice to take a look at how they have viewed in-market advertising in those markets. There’s some guidelines there that sort of date back to a previous definition of the market again before at least all these new entrance that I referenced. So in a nutshell that piece of it, the ability to consolidate horizontally in a market is a very good development for the industry and for us specifically as well.

Barton Crockett
Okay, that’s helpful. Just to try and understand a little bit more clearly, do you expect – what constraints would you expect us to end up with when this process is done? Do you think we’d be able to combine two or three of the top four stations in a market? Where do you think the puck’s going? And would you guys be a buyer or a seller or both in such a situation?
David T. Lougee
I think it’s very likely that two big four stations will be – that one owner will be allowed to own two big four stations finally.
Gracia C. Martore
Barton, I think as you have always known about us, we are incredibly opportunistic people. We will look at all the opportunities that come up. I think there’s room for, as Dave was trying to allude to, both outright M&A activity and then I think there’s other opportunities to look at portfolio optimizations where you might want to swap to better everybody’s portfolio concentration assuming as Dave says that the in-market duopoly rules get relaxed. So I think that we’re blessed with the fact that we have a strong balance sheet, we generated an enormous amount of free cash flow and that we have the opportunity to be active across all alternatives.
Barton Crockett
Okay. And then if I could switch gears with one other question. In your first quarter '17 outlook for flat to little bit of growth maybe in the media segment, granted there’s political and Super Bowl headwinds but you also have retrans growth. What is the implied trend in core advertising? It looks like you’re seeing maybe a high single digit decline there. I was wondering if you could comment on that. And when you talked about the 24% growth in retrans, do we see that in the first quarter or does it kind of ramp up a little bit later?
David T. Lougee
So the mid-single digits guidance is all-in and we do see retrans that number rolling through the year, because those were deals that were done at the end of the year. As core has been slow starting off in the marketplace, as I’m sure you’ve heard from others as well and it’s been ramping throughout the quarter but we do obviously have the headwinds of almost $10 million last year in the Super Bowl. So it won’t end up, up for us but it is improving.
Barton Crockett
Okay, I’ll leave it there. Thanks a lot guys.
Gracia C. Martore
To be more specific, Barton, I do not believe that we are in anyway anticipating excluding Super Bowl that our core numbers would be down in the high single digits. That’s not the expectation at all.
Barton Crockett
Okay, all right.
Gracia C. Martore
But the expectation would be that they would be better than that just to be clear.
Barton Crockett
Okay, I appreciate that. I’ll walk through the math offline with you guys, but I appreciate that clarification. Thanks.
Operator
We’ll take our next question from Alexia Quadrani with JPMorgan.
Alexia Quadrani
Hi. Thank you. Just a quick follow up first for my first question. Dave, I think when you just said it won’t end up, up for us when you were talking about the core advertising, you meant I think in the first quarter, right, because for the full year you are looking for improvement in core advertising as the year progresses. Is that correct?
David T. Lougee
That’s right, about the first quarter. We haven’t changed any. It’s very early and money’s been [indiscernible], so we’ve got no information to change any thinking around the year.
Alexia Quadrani
Okay. And then just want to follow up on your previous comments also about the virtual MVPDs that you were talking about. Any more color you can give us on how those relationships go? I know you don’t obviously want to talk about any specific contract, but just sort of in general, are the deals similar in nature to traditional deals when you talk about how it’s sort of net neutral from a subscriber whether they’re on linear or they’re on virtual MVPD? Could you also give us more color, are they multiyear deals, do they have escalators, I guess how are they generally set up? Thank you.

David T. Lougee
Sure, Alexia, I’m glad to. There’s no one clear model that – there’s several different forms of which the deals are coming down and being negotiated. For instance, I think it’s worthwhile dividing between new entrants and traditional MVPDs or getting into this space, like dish and direct got well publicized services out there. So the negotiations on the economics around those dish and direct deals are integrated into the affiliate negotiation types of – to the retrans negotiations that we have with those providers. So we’re ending up with almost duplicative economics – I should say almost duplicative economics on those deals. As it relates to the new entrants, the form of payment and the structure may look different than what we do with traditional retrans but the net retrans per subscriber is going to be ending up the same. So there’s no one-stop shopping on the way the deals are being constructed. But in the end they are all, like we said earlier, broadcasting is at the core of each of these services what they have to have to get off the ground. And the consumers have voted loudly that they want us. So that bodes very well for our near and long-term economics in that space.
Alexia Quadrani
Okay. Thank you very much.
Operator
We’ll take our next question from Douglas Arthur with Huber Research.
Douglas Arthur
Yes, two questions. Dave, in terms of the progress you’ve made on closing the gap on reverse retrans, do you sort of foresee any phasing of that throughout the year or just somewhere to Alexia’s question on retrans or fairly smooth progression? And then I’ve got a follow up.
David T. Lougee
No, the former is the right answer. We will be ramping throughout the year. We’ve modeled that. We’ll be doing --
Douglas Arthur
On initiatives --
David T. Lougee
Yes, on the initiatives that we have that they ramp throughout the year and that the cover on the gap, which we’ll more than do is for the full year.
Douglas Arthur
Okay, great. And then a follow up on the 6.9% growth constant currency CareerBuilder; Aurico, Workterra, how much did they add to that growth and what’s sort of the pro forma organic growth for CareerBuilder?
Gracia C. Martore
Doug, as you can appreciate, we are in the middle of looking at some strategic alternatives so I have to be a little bit careful. But what I would say to you is that every category of revenue grew at CareerBuilder other than jobs board, which we indicated in the past have seen price compression. With respect to some of the growth that we’re seeing from those acquisitions, that’s actually some growth that we look at it as a product. Adding the ability to do pre-hire testing and confirmation of employment and the like is a product that we were going to probably get into. This just helped us to accelerate that process. But what I can tell you is we saw growth across everything other than the jobs board piece of it and saw absolute growth.
Victoria Dux Harker
Doug, this is Victoria, just to expand on this. As we talked about in previous calls, a number of these opportunities in terms of products are now being sold across the sales forces, so they become an integrated part of the solution. So it’s not a direct sale from a previous company that we acquired, it’s much more integrated than that.
Douglas Arthur
Okay, great. Thank you.
Operator
Next, we’ll go to Kyle Evans with Stephens.
Kyle Evans
Hi. Thanks. Alex, could you talk a little bit more about the affiliations and where you took over direct sales, were those markets given back to you by choice? Did you take them as a part of the contracts? Just a little bit more color there would be appreciated.
Alex Vetter
Sure. We’re in close conversations with all of our channel partners and we’ve spent more time with the partners that have had the worst performance year-over-year, because we’re seeing many markets improve their performance year-over-year. So we’re working from the bottom up. And in those discussions, we identified several territories where they just didn’t have the sales pressure that we felt that we could provide in the market and they agreed to relinquish those territories to us. So it wasn’t a full-on takeover of an entire channel partner but rather them relinquishing a handful of markets and territories. And we’re going to continue, Kyle, to keep the pressure on our affiliate partners and if they’re unable to generate the results, we’re having active discussions about us stepping in and taking over.

Gar1
I think, Kyle, just to add to what Alex is saying, we are looking at all the alternatives. As Alex has indicated to the extent that the affiliate performance, particularly in a one affiliate or two affiliates worsens, then obviously we’re going to be talking to them before they get to that point where we’re going to take away the markets and see if there’s some logical conclusion we can come to that one benefits them but two benefits us and gets us control of those markets. So there’s a number of things going on that we really can’t comment on specifically, but rest assured that we are not sitting by and not taking actions in a variety of different ways.
Kyle Evans
Without going into specifics, how fast can you run that process? The affiliates were positive last quarter; third quarter negative. When could we expect to see more consistent growth there?
Alex Vetter
I would say that all the channel partners have expressed an intent to grow this year and given us plans that show that how they’re going to attain it. We’re backing their plans and in the event that they’re failing to achieve them that’s when we’re immediately engaging with them. I think the good news is over '15 and '16 we’ve got far more channel partners more engaged this year than we had in the past as they see the growth opportunity in front of them.
Gracia C. Martore
Yes, and I think this is the year where we’re going to be having those more creative conversations. Because if this year you don’t see that kind of improvement in '19 and '20 which is when they come up, then the results will be inevitable.
Kyle Evans
Right. A question for Dave. Could you give us an update on your subscriber account for retransmission in the quarter?
David T. Lougee
Yes, we’re relatively stable. We’ve just saw very mild declines consistent with other quarters that’s really specific to one provider. So we’re feeling --
Gracia C. Martore
M&A activity --
David T. Lougee
Yes, due to some M&A activity in the sector. So we continue to see them being relatively stable. We’ll once again call out when you see public reports, individual cable networks are seeing some significant gaps but that’s different than what’s happening with the overall MVPD subs. And as I mentioned before too, OTT is over time going to become replacement and possibly even additive.
Kyle Evans
Okay. Lastly, you raised your retrans guide. Congrats on better than expected there. The last thing we got from you on 2017 media was for low singles to mid singles growth; still no change to that for the full year for media?
Gracia C. Martore
Yes, I think again what we would say, Kyle, is that it’s incredibly early in the year. As Dave said, the year – I think universally across the broadcast group you’ve heard folks talking about the fact that the year got off to a much slower start than anticipated. In part, I think we all should have gone back and looked at what happened after Presidential election years and would have seen that there’s not – there’s some pattern to that. This year is going to be an interesting year because when you think about some of the actions that could happen around the economy this year, around taxes, around other things. This year could go in a variety of different ways. And if you saw tax relief for the middle class actually happening this year, et cetera, that could be a positive. So this is one of those unusual years where there’s a lot of things at play and we’re just going to have to see how it all unfolds during the course of the year.
Kyle Evans
Thank you.
Operator
We’ll take our next question from Marci Ryvicker with Wells Fargo.
Marci Ryvicker
Hi. David, just want to clarify something. You talked about that retrans gap going from 48 million to 55 million to 25 million to 30 million. Is it based on your negotiations in a rate and from initiatives or just initiatives?

David T. Lougee
No. Initiatives have nothing to do with retrans, Marci. It’s just that the actual gap between what we pay out networks, right, that we were going to have this year with retrans because of the NBC hit, that’s the gap. And it went down simply because of the retrans revenue growth.
Marci Ryvicker
Okay. And then in terms of the initiatives, is there any way to think about it in terms of leaving this into our models as the year progresses at incremental I think 40 million to 50 million that you talked about?
David T. Lougee
Yes, I think that’s a good way to think about. I think we’re on track to do that. What pockets the revenue will come in will probably change a little bit through the course of the year as more of it will move to digital. But probably about a half of that is in core and about a third in core and digital and other all-in for the year. But the mix will change and it will be at a margin consistent with the rest of our business.
Marci Ryvicker
Okay. And then one last one and I apologize if I missed it. For Cars.com, did you talk about the contribution from DealerRater I guess a Gracia [ph] question?
Gracia C. Martore
No, we didn’t talk about it because frankly we see that literally as a product. We had already at Cars amassed some number of reviews. It was a business that we wanted to get into. We basically bought them and got access to 3 million reviews. Then what we did is we have a sales force which they did not have. We’re bringing the sale force to bear and that’s something that will ramp up during the course of 2017. So the contribution is modest but really it’s a product extension as we see it rather than an M&A actively.
Marci Ryvicker
Got it. Thank you very much.
Gracia C. Martore
Thank you, Marci.
Operator
Our next question comes from Dan Kurnos with The Benchmark Co.
Dan Kurnos
Great. Thanks. Good morning. Just quickly, Dave, I guess kind of housekeeping. As other people have kind of talked about this, I know you gave a little bit of color around the extra days but if you pull out political views, give us a sense of what Q4 core was ex-political [ph]? It looks like there was a little bit of upside. And just any incremental color beyond auto on categories in case I missed it?
David T. Lougee
For the fourth quarter, core excluding the four days was down high single digits. But as far as categories go, auto was strong. It came back in March after the crowd out in November. And on the flipside of that, media and telecom down a little bit.
Dan Kurnos
Great. And then just for Alex, just a couple of high level thoughts for you as you sort of prepare life after TEGNA I guess. Just can you talk about sort of the influence and the shifting spend from the OEMs back and forth between digital and broadcast, and that’s growing to the dealer level, sort of the impacts between the mix shift we’re seeing in cars between new and shifting more towards used? And then any comments you could have on sort of service usage on mobile versus desktop? Thanks.
Alex Vetter
Sure. First of all, I don’t have the media allocation numbers in front of me but manufacturers have been aggressively shifting their dollars towards digital over the past few years. And importantly with a flattening new car sales year or SAR predicted for '17, I think you’re seeing manufacturers increase their focus on in-market sites where they can capture incrementality. And retention marketing is probably the biggest term we’re hearing in 2017 from manufacturers as they really seek to hold on to their existing sales and try to take share from their competitors. And so platforms like ours are highly captive. 86% of our audience intends to buy a car within a very near window. So manufacturers can really use that consumer indifference to their advantage. And so we continue to see manufacturers, as I mentioned, if you back out the two accounts that had an agency changeover and a switch in their buying process, our manufacturer spending would have been up in double-digit growth. And we see those two manufacturers have already started to reengage in their first quarter spending. So we expect that process to work its way out. I think on your next question was about new and used trends. While new is projected to be flat to down for '17, the used car market is extremely strong and healthy and growing. And about 75% of our total site traffic comes in looking for a used car. And while we see our users vacillate back and forth between new and used, we’ve got a massive data base of used vehicles in our data base over nearly almost 2 million used car listings in our data base. So we’re seeing strong growth in the used car market for '17. And then the last question, I want to make sure I understand it. Your question was about service usage on devices?

Dan Kurnos
Yes, I just want to kind of get a sense – look, obviously you’re getting more traffic through mobile. You’ve gone through the replatforming now. You added a lot of ancillary service offerings. So I’m just curious sort of any learnings you have so far on customer usage of services on mobile versus sort of traditional desktop?
Alex Vetter
Sure. First of all, at a macro level, we know intent to buy increases as people move to mobile devices. Our overall business has a six-month purchase horizon for buying a car. If you isolate purchase intent just to mobile devices, the purchase horizon shortens to nearly 90 days. So we think as manufacturers and dealers come to realize that mobile is the last word in deciding what and where to buy, they’re going to just start increasing their investment in mobile much like they first started increasing their investment in digital several years back. And so there’s a learning curve there for the auto industry on how they can use mobile. There’s obviously less room for display advertising and they have to think a little bit more creatively about how they market on mobile devices. But in '17, mobile now accounts for over half of our total site traffic and we don’t ever see a day coming back where the balance will shift back the other way. It’s only going to grow in importance in '17 and beyond. And marketers, we think if you follow the narratives and all industries are viewing mobile as the next battlefield for their marketing dollars.
Dan Kurnos
That’s really helpful. I guess I will also ask a little bit more on the add-ons like mechanics, that kind of stuff, actually service of the car. Do you see more people use mobile for that purpose or are you seeing the same kind of dynamics?
Alex Vetter
Well, we are seeing an increase in usage in our mobile devices on dealership lots. And so yes, pricing validation, selection validation, a lot of our mobile usage is happening on dealer lots, and I’d be happy to follow up with you offline and get you some more detailed statistics on usage patterns.
Dan Kurnos
All right, that sounds good, Alex. Thanks for all the color. I appreciate it guys.
Gracia C. Martore
Great. We’ve got time for just one more quick question.
Operator
Jim Goss with Barrington Research, please go ahead.
James Goss
Thanks. I wanted to ask about the extent of your program development. The BOLD deal with MGM where you’re going to be producing and they’re going to be distributing, I wondered if you might talk about a little bit more about what that’s going to entail. You say it’s a multiplatform type of venture. Will MGM be your primary partner or only partner going forward, or is this one of many partners you envision as you sort of ramp up this sort of business? And maybe related, can you talk a little about the timing of cost recognition and the revenue potential or will this be more of an equity line item?
David T. Lougee
So on the partnership question first, Jim, let me say that we do plan to do business in the programming space with lots of folks. MGM is a good partner but we don’t intend to be exclusive as nor they. I think you’ll us partnering with other station groups as well. From a timing standpoint, I’ve been talking more about your first question about the nature of the show. What’s going to be unique about it is it is going to be live. So if you got a timeslot at 3 o’clock Eastern or you’ve got a timeslot at 9 AM Pacific Time and you’re on the West Coast, we will – based on the demand from stations, we will be producing multiple half hour increments so that people will have live on the air. We think the data show us that live is becoming increasingly important in linear viewing. And we say online, it’s also we can be an OTT product. Social and digital will drive the content. Because it’s live, we’re not constrained by non-topicality of things being four or five hours old or having to be produced a day in advance and pumped out by satellite in the morning. So trending items I’d say like the Oscars last night and how people are responding to that thing will be embedded into the content of the show in real time. And we will be in turn – the producers of the show will be doing content to engage with the viewers on their own mobile devices while they’re watching the show.

Gracia C. Martore
On your accounting question, Jim, it’s still a little early on BOLD. We’re going to have to see who gets added to the mix, et cetera, to see whether it will be more on the equity side; operating, non-operating equity investment. So we’ll keep you posted on that as we get – we’re really in the nascent stages of it. We introduced it. We now are looking at other opportunities. And as soon as we’ve got that all figured out, we will share with you what the appropriate treatment will be.
James Goss
And if I could squeeze in one more thought. The ATSC 3.0 impact, I think it will relate to digital elements of the broadcasting business. Does this tie into the whole concept of BOLD?
David T. Lougee
Jim, not specifically. I think that ATSC will provide the opportunity for one-to-one broadcasting and advertising and will be IP compatible with other wireless services. So there’s a number of direct businesses that could come out of it. But the time horizon we’re launching BOLD here in the fall and the business opportunities with 3.0 are a few years away. So it’s not to say there won’t be some potentially innovative interactions between the technology and content, but no it’s not the – BOLD itself is not setup as a 3.0 in this year.
Gracia C. Martore
Thanks, Jim, for your questions.
James Goss
Thank you.
Gracia C. Martore
We really appreciate you joining us this morning. We are very sensitive to your time, so if you have any further questions you can reach out to Jeff Heinz at 703-873-6917. Have a fantastic day. Thanks.
Operator
This concludes today’s conference. Thank you for your participation.
Copyright policy: All transcripts on this site are the copyright of Seeking Alpha. However, we view them as an important resource for bloggers and journalists, and are excited to contribute to the democratization of financial information on the Internet. (Until now investors have had to pay thousands of dollars in subscription fees for transcripts.) So our reproduction policy is as follows: You may quote up to 400 words of any transcript on the condition that you attribute the transcript to Seeking Alpha and either link to the original transcript or to www.SeekingAlpha.com. All other use is prohibited.
THE INFORMATION CONTAINED HERE IS A TEXTUAL REPRESENTATION OF THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S CONFERENCE CALL, CONFERENCE PRESENTATION OR OTHER AUDIO PRESENTATION, AND WHILE EFFORTS ARE MADE TO PROVIDE AN ACCURATE TRANSCRIPTION, THERE MAY BE MATERIAL ERRORS, OMISSIONS, OR INACCURACIES IN THE REPORTING OF THE SUBSTANCE OF THE AUDIO PRESENTATIONS. IN NO WAY DOES SEEKING ALPHA ASSUME ANY RESPONSIBILITY FOR ANY INVESTMENT OR OTHER DECISIONS MADE BASED UPON THE INFORMATION PROVIDED ON THIS WEB SITE OR IN ANY TRANSCRIPT. USERS ARE ADVISED TO REVIEW THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S AUDIO PRESENTATION ITSELF AND THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S SEC FILINGS BEFORE MAKING ANY INVESTMENT OR OTHER DECISIONS.
If you have any additional questions about our online transcripts, please contact us at: transcripts@seekingalpha.com. Thank you!
About this article:ExpandTagged: Services, Broadcasting - TV, TranscriptsError in this transcript? Let us know.Contact us to add your company to our coverage or use transcripts in your business.Learn more about Seeking Alpha transcripts here.Follow SA Transcripts and get email alertsSearch TranscriptThis transcriptFindAll transcriptsFindCompare To:All TGNA TranscriptsOther Companies in this sector





Services including Restaurant and Retail Stocks | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Services including Restaurant and Retail StocksTime For Chipotle To Replicate McDonald's PlaybookCMG• Today, 9:43 AM • Sabra Capital Partners•1 CommentScorpio Bulkers Inc 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesSALT• Today, 9:23 AM • SA TranscriptsManpowerGroup Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesMAN• Today, 8:58 AM • SA TranscriptsThe Accelerating Death Of Sears RetailSHLD• Today, 8:58 AM • Elephant Analytics•6 CommentsWhy Are Investors Expecting More From PriceSmart?PSMT• Today, 8:36 AM • Vince MartinThe Walt Disney Co. - A DCF AnalysisDIS• Today, 8:19 AM • Saanal Deshpande•7 CommentsShould You Invest In TJX Shares?TJX• Today, 8:18 AM • Canadian Dividend Growth Investor•1 CommentSome Thoughts On A Discovery-Scripps MergerDISCA, SNI• Today, 8:09 AM • Kenra Investors•1 CommentJ.C. Penney: Diversifying Its OfferingsJCP• Today, 7:18 AM • Elephant Analytics•6 CommentsGameStop: Deeply Undervalued Company Or A Value Trap?GME• Today, 6:46 AM • Daniel Schönberger•5 CommentsFoot Locker Keeps Getting BetterFL• Today, 6:25 AM • Nicholas D. Rempel•4 CommentsAlibaba: My Valuation Of The StockBABA• Today, 6:15 AM • Kenra Investors•11 CommentsBuffalo Wild Wings: A Path Back To RelevanceBWLD• Today, 5:54 AM • Avi Danda•1 CommentTungsten Corp. 2017 Q4 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesTUNG• Today, 4:02 AM • SA TranscriptsOf Chipotle, Sino-Global, Valuation And Glengarry Glen Ross?CMG• Today, 2:00 AM • The Nattering Naybob•9 CommentsRyanair Holdings PLC 2017 Q4 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesRYAAY• Today, 1:50 AM • SA Transcripts•1 CommentWild Ride For DryShipsDRYS• Today, 12:54 AM • Morningsidepark•6 CommentsDryShips - CEO'S Voting Rights Down To 3 Million. Shareholders Gain Control?DRYS• Today, 12:08 AM • Research & Investment•27 CommentsSherwin-Williams: Strong Q2 Thanks To Newly Acquired ValsparSHW• Yesterday, 5:02 PM • Sure Dividend•4 CommentsTJX Isn't Getting 'Amazoned,' But It Still Isn't Cheap EitherTJX• Yesterday, 3:32 PM • Shareholders Unite•11 CommentsCan Teekay Corporation Rescue Teekay Offshore PartnersTK• Yesterday, 3:10 PM • Long Player•43 CommentsKansas City Southern Bucks Last Week's Class I Sell-OffKSU• Yesterday, 11:07 AM • James Sands•3 CommentsDelta - Life Isn't FairDAL• Yesterday, 7:19 AM • Michael Rogus•30 CommentsDunkin' Brands Discounted Cash Flow Valuation: Buying OpportunityDNKN• Yesterday, 6:57 AM • Sean Warneke•4 CommentsAvoid Sears Stock Like The PlagueSHLD• Yesterday, 6:36 AM • Christopher Yuen•55 CommentsAthenahealth - Beauty Is In The Eye Of The BeholderATHN• Yesterday, 4:04 AM • Christopher Speetzen•1 CommentL.B. Foster - Prices Have Recovered But Remain UndervaluedFSTR• Yesterday, 3:23 AM • DTF Capital•3 CommentsIndependent News & Media Plc - Has The World Really Ended?Editors' Pick • INNZF• Sat, Jul. 22, 11:14 AM • Philip Ryan•7 CommentsBuy Chipotle Stock Amid Recent Outbreak FearsCMG• Sat, Jul. 22, 8:48 AM • Christopher Yuen•135 CommentsGreene King: Is The 5% Yield Enough?GKNGY, GRKGF• Sat, Jul. 22, 8:36 AM • Mark Dockray•10 CommentsFundamentals And Technicals Agree On W.W. Grainger StockGWW• Fri, Jul. 21, 7:35 PM • Aleksandar Vichev•12 CommentsThe Long Case For LiLACEditors' Pick • LILA• Fri, Jul. 21, 4:00 PM • Stephen SarokiThe Short Case For Singapore Press HoldingsEditors' Pick • SGPRY, SGPRF• Fri, Jul. 21, 4:00 PM • Warren Chan•2 CommentsBed & Bath Beyond: A No Brainer, Management Optionality UndervaluedBBBY• Fri, Jul. 21, 3:24 PM • Kario-Paul Brown•11 CommentsComcast And Liberty Global Invest In Integrate's Demand MarTechLBTYA• Fri, Jul. 21, 3:24 PM • Donovan Jones•2 CommentsWhy Air France-KLM Is In A BubbleAFRAF• Fri, Jul. 21, 3:23 PM • Wubbe Bos•4 CommentsKroger's Recent Price Weakness Might Just Be A Good LossKR• Fri, Jul. 21, 3:00 PM • Chuck Carnevale•79 CommentsWag Of Approval For PetIQPETQ• Fri, Jul. 21, 1:56 PM • Don Dion•4 CommentsGNC: I'm Not Bluffing With Pocket DeucesGNC• Fri, Jul. 21, 1:37 PM • Courage & Conviction Investing•56 CommentsDynaCert: Promising To Boost Transportation Business Profit MarginsDYFSF• Fri, Jul. 21, 1:00 PM • Research & Investment•6 CommentsNew Stocks In Exec Comp And ROIC Model Portfolio: July 2017FL• Fri, Jul. 21, 12:26 PM • David Trainer•1 CommentDollar Tree: Paying The Growth Premium Is Not Worth The RiskDLTR• Fri, Jul. 21, 11:43 AM • Samuel Smith•10 CommentsMoody's Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesMCO• Fri, Jul. 21, 11:42 AM • SA TranscriptsNetflix: Does Growth Justify The Valuation?NFLX• Fri, Jul. 21, 11:31 AM • Hudson River Capital Research•66 CommentsSprouts Is Not Sprouting HigherSFM, WFM• Fri, Jul. 21, 10:45 AM • Martin Hausman•5 CommentsLowes: Contrarian Play Post Sears/Amazon DealLOW• Fri, Jul. 21, 10:41 AM • L&F Capital Management•11 CommentseBay: Results Bemuse The StreetEBAY• Fri, Jul. 21, 10:30 AM • Quad 7 Capital•19 CommentsDividend Champion On Clearance Rack And In My PortfolioTGT• Fri, Jul. 21, 9:48 AM • Colorado Wealth Management Fund•221 CommentsA Bidding War For Advisory Board CompanyABCO• Fri, Jul. 21, 9:27 AM • Ensemble CapitalPapa Murphy's Holdings: An Overlooked Competitor In A Crowded SpaceEditors' Pick • FRSH• Fri, Jul. 21, 9:19 AM • Dining Stocks Online•13 CommentsHome Depot - Don't Panic, BuyHD• Fri, Jul. 21, 9:00 AM • Leo Nelissen•30 CommentsDineEquity And Its 9% DividendDIN• Fri, Jul. 21, 8:51 AM • Prescient Investment Analysis•8 CommentsNo Need To Ditch UnitedUAL• Fri, Jul. 21, 8:51 AM • Detroit Bear•2 CommentsKansas City Southern 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesKSU• Fri, Jul. 21, 8:33 AM • SA TranscriptsDryShips Inc.: Reverse Split Selling Is Not Over YetDRYS• Fri, Jul. 21, 8:30 AM • Morningsidepark•98 CommentsHome Depot: What Changed?HD• Fri, Jul. 21, 2:24 AM • Joseph Harry•31 CommentsDunkin' Brands: A No-Frills 20% OpportunityDNKN• Fri, Jul. 21, 12:29 AM • Black Coral Research•6 CommentsWill No Direct Competition Help WWE Offset Declining Viewership?WWE• Thu, Jul. 20, 5:43 PM • Jeremy McKinzie•7 CommentseBay Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesEBAY• Thu, Jul. 20, 5:01 PM • SA TranscriptsHome Depot: A Dividend Growth Stock With A 29% Increase This YearHD• Thu, Jul. 20, 3:29 PM • Ploutos Investing•15 CommentsDisney Is A Buy, But Not Because Of Spider-ManDIS• Thu, Jul. 20, 2:54 PM • Black Coral Research•13 CommentsAutoZone Is The Deal Of The CenturyAZO• Thu, Jul. 20, 2:27 PM • Bank On Insight•37 CommentsUnion Pacific Surprises AgainUNP• Thu, Jul. 20, 1:35 PM • Jonathan Weber•25 CommentsNetflix's Success Driven By What Drives Other Tech Giants' SuccessesNFLX• Thu, Jul. 20, 1:16 PM • Gary Bourgeault•22 CommentsDryShips: Don't EvenDRYS• Thu, Jul. 20, 12:32 PM • Daniel Jones•69 CommentsNetflix: Warning Flags FlyingNFLX• Thu, Jul. 20, 12:23 PM • Michael Wiggins De Oliveira•32 CommentsGet On Board These Rail StocksNSC, KSU, GWR• Thu, Jul. 20, 12:21 PM • Zacks Investment Research•2 CommentsScholastic Corporation 2017 Q4 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesSCHL• Thu, Jul. 20, 11:19 AM • SA TranscriptsThe Sherwin-Williams Company 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesSHW• Thu, Jul. 20, 10:57 AM • SA TranscriptsOmnicom Group Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesOMC• Thu, Jul. 20, 10:03 AM • SA TranscriptsRite Aid: Don't Be FooledRAD• Thu, Jul. 20, 9:55 AM • Kumquat Research•157 CommentsDryShips' All-Time High - $1.47 Billion A Share?DRYS• Thu, Jul. 20, 9:49 AM • Research & Investment•48 CommentsCSX Pullback After Second Quarter Earnings Is JustifiedCSX• Thu, Jul. 20, 9:16 AM • James Sands•8 CommentsUnion Pacific Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesUNP• Thu, Jul. 20, 9:10 AM • SA TranscriptsBurlington Stores Looks TemptingEditors' Pick • BURL• Thu, Jul. 20, 9:08 AM • Vince Martin•4 Comments123456...800Next Page





Earnings Call Transcripts | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO» 








Earnings Transcripts


  Sectors 


All
Most Popular

Basic Materials
Conglomerates
Consumer Goods
Financial
Healthcare
Industrial Goods
Services
Technology
Utilities










PetMed Express' (PETS) CEO Mendo Akdag on Q1 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


PETS•
      Mon, Jul. 24,  9:49 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




Tungsten's (TUNG) CEO Rick Hurwitz on Q3 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


TUNG•
      Mon, Jul. 24,  7:56 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




Vodafone Group's (VOD) CEO Vittorio Colao on Q1 2018 Trading Update Conference Call (Transcript)


VOD•
      Sat, Jul. 22,  5:03 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Metso Corporation's (MXTOF) CEO Matti Kähkönen on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


MXTOF•
      Sat, Jul. 22, 12:08 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




Ingenico Group's (INGIF) CEO Philippe Lazare on Acquisition of Bambora & Q2 2017 Trading Update (Transcript)


INGIF•
      Fri, Jul. 21, 10:17 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Danske Bank's (DNSKF) CEO Thomas Borgen on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


DNSKF•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  7:45 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Cinedigm (CIDM) Cinedigm Bison Agreement Conference (Transcript)


CIDM•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  7:33 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Western Alliance Bancorporation's (WAL) CEO Robert Sarver on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


WAL•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  7:16 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Mobile Mini's (MINI) CEO Erik Olsson on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


MINI•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  6:55 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Givaudan's (GVDNY) CEO Gilles Andrier on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


GVDNY•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  6:50 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




MB Financial's (MBFI) CEO Mitchell Feiger on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


MBFI•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  6:35 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Cementos Pacasmayo's (CPAC) CEO Humberto Nadal on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


CPAC•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  6:35 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Sensient Technologies' (SXT) CEO Paul Manning on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


SXT•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  6:12 PM

        •
SA Transcripts
•1 Comment 



Moody's (MCO) CEO Raymond McDaniel on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


MCO•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  6:09 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Regions Financial's (RF) CEO Grayson Hall on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


RF•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  5:53 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Accell Group (ACGPF) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


ACGPF•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  5:52 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Del Frisco's Restaurant Group's (DFRG) CEO Norman Abdallah on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


DFRG•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  5:45 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Volaris Aviation's (VLRS) CEO Enrique Beltranena on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


VLRS•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:53 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Colgate-Palmolive's (CL) CEO Ian Cook on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


CL•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:51 PM

        •
SA Transcripts
•1 Comment 



McClatchy's (MNI) CEO Craig Forman on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


MNI•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:42 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Badger Meter's (BMI) CEO Rich Meeusen on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


BMI•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:30 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




OFG Bancorp's (OFG) CEO Jose Rafael Fernandez on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


OFG•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:26 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




General Electric's (GE) CEO Jeff Immelt on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


GE•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:24 PM

        •
SA Transcripts
•23 Comments 



Husky's (HUSKF) CEO Rob Peabody on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


HUSKF•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:21 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Glacier Bancorp's (GBCI) CEO Randall Chesler on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


GBCI•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:17 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Honeywell International's (HON) CEO Darius Adamczyk on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


HON•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:15 PM

        •
SA Transcripts
•1 Comment 



CoBiz Financial's (COBZ) CEO Steve Bangert on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


COBZ•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  3:51 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Ameris Bancorp's (ABCB) CEO Edwin Hortman on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


ABCB•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  3:46 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Banco Latinoamericano De Comercio Exterior's (BLX) CEO Rubens Amaral On Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


BLX•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  3:44 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Citizens Financial Group's (CFG) CEO Bruce Van Saun on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


CFG•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  3:31 PM

        •
SA Transcripts





123456...4430Next Page





Search Transcripts






You can use: AND,NOT, OR,* *(exact phrase)













 



TGNA Gracia C. Martore Insider Trades for TEGNA Inc.


































X

Tweet
 

Share this bulletin

Get news bulletins by email

Bulletin

Key passages from Jared Kushner's pre-testimony statement »
        




Investor Alert







New York Markets Close in:



Market Snapshot
Winners and Losers







X

Tweet
 

Share this bulletin

Get news bulletins by email

Bulletin

Hasbro shares down more than 8% early Monday »
        

















Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close































TEGNA Inc.

                  NYSE: TGNA
          



GO



Set Alerts
Find a Broker




Join TD Ameritrade




Market Index


 

Overview
      
Profile
      
News
      
Charts
      
Financials
      
Historical Quotes
      
Analyst Estimates
      
Options
      
SEC Filings
      
Insiders
      


/marketstate/country/us

TEGNA Inc.



Market open
 --Real time quotes
Jul 24, 2017, 9:57 a.m.


TGNA

/quotes/zigman/53035508/composite


$
14.70




Change

-0.01
-0.07%

Volume
Volume 78,728
Real time quotes








/quotes/zigman/53035508/composite
Previous close

$
			14.71
		


$
				14.70
			
Change

-0.01
-0.07%





Day low
Day high
$14.68
$14.74










52 week low
52 week high

            $11.47
        

            $17.07
        


















Insider Activity


Individual




Gracia C. Martore



Ms. Gracia C. Martore is President, Chief Executive Officer & Director at TEGNA, Inc. and President & Director at Belo Corp. She is on the Board of Directors at WestRock Co., TEGNA, Inc., Gannett Foundation, Belo Corp., The Associated Press, Inc., The Paley Center for Media (New York), and Factory Mutual Insurance Co.
Ms. Martore was previously employed as Independent Director by MeadWestvaco Corp. She also served on the board at Gannett SpinCo, Inc.
She received her undergraduate degree from Wellesley College.



Transactions


Date
Shares
Transaction
Value








        Copyright 2017 FactSet Research Systems Inc. All rights reserved. Source FactSet Fundamentals.
    











            Officers and Executives
        





Mr. David T. Lougee 
President, Chief Executive Officer & Director




Ms. Lynn  Beall 
Executive Vice President & COO-Media Operations




Ms. Victoria Dux Harker 
Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President




Mr. Todd A. Mayman 
Chief Legal & Administration Officer, Executive VP




Mr. Ed  Busby 
Senior Vice President-Strategy




Mr. Nicholas  Lehman 
Chief Strategy Officer




Ms. Judy  Vogel 
Vice President-Research




Mr. Sean  Wechter 
Senior VP-Digital Technology & Product Development




Ms. Alison K. Engel 
Vice President-Finance




Mr. Tom R. Cox 
Vice President-Corporate Development




Mr. John C. Deushane 
President & General Manager-WXIA TV Station




Ms. Saira  Stahl 
Vice President-Strategy




Ms. Dunia A. Shive 
Senior Vice President




Mr. William A. Behan 
Senior Vice President-Labor Relations




Ms. Barbara W. Wall 
Vice President & Senior Associate General Counsel




Mr. Howard  Griffin 
Vice President-National Sales




Ms. Wendy  Hurwitz 
Director-Consumer Marketing




Mr. Randy  Kilgore 
President-National Sales




Ms. Debra  Goetz 
Vice President-Marketing




Mr. Amber  Allman 
Director-External Communications




Mr. Craig  Etheridge 
Senior Vice President-Digital & Mobile Sales




Mr. Andrew T. Yost 
Senior Vice President-Consumer Sales & Marketing




Mr. Clifton A. McClelland 
Principal Accounting Officer, VP & Controller




Ms. Anne  Bentley 
Chief Communications Officer & Vice President




Mr. Steve  Kidera 
Manager-Corporate Communications




Mr. Jeffrey  Heinz 
Vice President-Investor Relations




Mr. Jeff  Newma 
Chief Human Resources Officer & Senior VP




Mr. Akin S. Harrison 
Secretary & Vice President




Ms. Marjorie  Magner 
Chairman




Ms. Jennifer  Dulski 
Independent Director




Mr. Henry Wadsworth McGee 
Independent Director




Mr. Bruce P. Nolop 
Independent Director




Mr. Howard D. Elias 
Independent Director




Mr. Scott K. McCune 
Independent Director




Mr. Neal  Shapiro 
Independent Director




Ms. Susan P. Ness 
Independent Director




Ms. Lidia L. Fonseca 
Independent Director
















Log In




9:58 AM EDT
July 24, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Open


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Open


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
9:53aBREAKINGDow slumps as Wall Street focuses on earnings; Fed ahead
9:53aHere are key passages from Kushner’s testimony
9:50aO.J. Simpson made over $400,000 while in prison and won’t have to give any of it to the Goldman family
9:48aThese cash-strapped couples want total strangers to pay for their weddings
9:47aThe Met Installs a Three-Story-High Painting
9:47aIHS Markit services PMI unchanged at 54.2 in July
9:46aIHS Markit manufacturing PMI rises to 53.2 in July from 52.0
9:44aBREAKINGHibbett's stock, down 26%, on track for worse daily loss in more than 18 years
9:44aTreasury yields rise as investors gear up for midweek Fed meeting
9:43aDick's Sporting Goods shares down 4.5% in Monday trading
9:43aFoot Locker shares down 4.7% in Monday trading
9:42aSnap shares trading at record intraday low, shares down 2%
9:42aHibbett Sports down nearly 26.4% in Monday trading after profit warning
9:42aCal-Maine shares down 8.4% in early trade
9:40aIf you can’t resist the lure of bottom-fishing this market, at least follow these five rules
9:35aPetMed's stock soars 9.4% to record high after Q1 results
9:34aNvidia stock price target raised to $180 from $155 at Canaccord Genuity
9:33aNasdaq Composite Index relatively unchanged
9:33aS&P 500 opens virtually flat
9:33aAmericans in this field have the highest rate of divorce by age 30
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,543.71

-36.36
-0.17%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,392.92

+5.16
+0.08%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,469.71

-2.83
-0.11%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15








































































Gracia C. Martore | AFL-CIO






      Skip to main content
    















Gracia C. Martore












TEGNA (TGNA)  
    McClean, VA


Total Compensation For Year 2016
$11,016,789






Salary
$1,000,000


Bonus
$2,250,000


Value of Stock Awards
$5,000,008


Value of Option Awards
$0


Non-Equity Incentive Plan Compensation
$0


Change in Pension Value and Deferred Compensation Earnings
$2,466,863


All Other Compensation
$299,918


Total
$11,016,789







In 2016, Gracia C. Martore made
292
times the average rank-and-file worker’s pay


How you compare


Your salary and benefits



Show Me








How you compare?






YOU


$11,016,789

Gracia C. Martore




Gracia C. Martore’s compensation could support  workers earning your salary and benefits, and 292 workers earning the average income.*
Please consider donating to a strike fund.




Compare Again


Take Action




* Average worker income is the average hours and earnings of production and nonsupervisory employees on private nonfarm payrolls, according to the U.S. Bureau of Labor Statistics.
















×













































Gracia Martore, President and CEO, Gannett Co. | The Paley Center for Media






Gracia Martore, President and CEO, Gannett Co.














































Membership
Fall Previews
Public Programs
Visit
Media Council
Rentals


Media Council Membership
Upcoming Events








Search













Upcoming Events

July 2017 NYLA

« prev
next »
 1
2345678
9101112131415
16171819202122
23242526272829
3031 




View Public Programs


Careers-



About-

Leadership

Mission & History

Career, Internship, and Volunteer Opportunities

Contact Us

FAQ



Press Room/Logos-

Current Press Releases

Press Release Archive

Press Kit/Logos

Register for Press Information



Education-

Classes & Workshops

Videoconferencing

Workshops for Educators

Educational Resources

The Scholars Room

University Series

Search the Collection



Perspectives-

TV Noir: Let There Be Dark

Made In NY Talks

American Horror Story: The Style of Scare

The Handmaid’s Tale: Costumes by Ane Crabtree

You Can't Stop the Beat: Art & Artistry of Hairspray Live

Tony Bennett: Celebrating 90 Years of Artistry

African-American Achievements in Television Experience the Paley Tributes Featuring Your Favorite Stars & Shows

The Beatles Meet “Collective Depression”? Think Again

CBS Daytime Celebrates 30 Years at #1

Comedy Central's South Park 20 Experience

Discovery’s Shark Week VR Exhibit 

The Artistry of Outlander

The Live Coverage of the March on Washington

David Bowie: Sound + Vision

TV’s Funniest Animated Stars: A Paley Center For Media Special

Behind the Story with the Paley Center

A Short History of Drugs (On TV)

From Alternative To Mainstream: '90s Comedians



Screenings-



Paley Archive-



Paley Event Replays-



Blog Archive-

David Bushman

Ron Simon

Rebecca Paller

Arthur Smith

Barry Monush





Membership-

Renew

Individual Membership

Patron Membership NY

Patron Membership LA

Corporate Membership

Distinctive Spaces for Rental



Visit-

Plan Your NY Visit

Plan Your LA Visit

Directions

Group Visits



Shop-



Support Us-

LA Annual Benefit 

Major Donors

Other Ways to Support the Paley Center



Rentals-



eNews: Event Blasts-





Paley Media Council-

Media Council Membership

Upcoming Events




Our Communities







Find us on Google+









Paley Dialogues: Breakfast
Gracia Martore, President and CEO, Gannett Co.
Wednesday, November 6, 2013 8:00 to 9:00 amNew York

Video:     Photos:   Gracia C. Martore, President and Chief Executive Officer, Gannett Co.Gracia Martore is president and chief executive officer of Gannett Co., Inc. She became CEO in October, 2011. Martore joined Gannett in 1985 as assistant treasurer. She became a vice president in the treasury group in 1993 and added investor relations duties in 1995. She was named treasurer and vice president/investor relations in 1998 and promoted to senior vice president of finance in addition to her treasurer’s responsibilities in 2001. In 2003, Martore became senior vice president and chief financial officer and was appointed to Gannett’s management committee. In 2005, Martore became executive vice president and CFO and in 2010 was named president and chief operating officer. Prior to joining Gannett, she worked for 12 years in the banking industry. Martore serves on the Gannett board of directors as well as on the boards of directors of The Associated Press, FM Global, and MeadWestvaco Corporation. In 2012, Martore was named one of the “50 Most Powerful Women in Business” by Fortune Magazine. Following her selection as CEO in 2011, Martore was cited by Forbes in a review of the world’s most powerful women and, in 2012, she was named to Forbes’ “100 Most Powerful Women” list. Martore also was named one of “Washington’s 100 Most Powerful Women” by Washingtonian Magazine. Institutional Investor magazine named Martore one of the best CFOs in America and ranked her the “Best CFO in America” in the publishing and advertising agencies category for three years in a row (2004, 2005 and 2006). The Washington Post also named Martore one of the top 10 female executives at major companies in the Washington region. In 2006 she was named “CFO of the Year” by Virginia Business. Martore is a graduate from Wellesley College with a double major in history and political science. While there, she was named a Wellesley Scholar for academic excellence. Martore and her husband Joseph have two children.Moderated by Pat Mitchell, President and Chief Executive Officer, The Paley Center for MediaFrom network correspondent and producer to president and CEO of PBS to her current position, Pat Mitchell’s career is characterized by her focus on media as a powerful force for social change. Her work has been recognized with forty-four Emmy Awards, five Peabody’s, and two Academy Award nominations. Mitchell has received numerous honors including the Sandra Day O’Connor Award for Leadership, the Women in Cable and Telecommunications Woman of the Year Award, and was a 2008 Broadcasting & Cable Hall of Fame Honoree. Mitchell serves on the boards of the Sundance Institute, the Mayo Clinic, VDAY (a movement to end violence against women), Human Rights Watch, and the Jordan River Foundation’s U.S. board. A member of the Council on Foreign Relations and the International Women’s Forum, Mitchell was named to Newsweek's 2011 list of "150 Women Who Shake the World." This event is exclusive to Media Council members and other invited guests. To find out if you're eligible to join the Media Council, contact Stephanie Kousoulas at 212-621-6732 or mediacouncil@paleycenter.org. Information about upcoming Media Council events, or learn more about past Media Council events.


            

 

            
            
                
            

        








25 West 52 Street
• New York, NY 10019
• 212.621.6600
465 N. Beverly Drive
• Beverly Hills, CA 90210
• 310.786.1000


Copyright 1995–2017
Terms of service
Privacy policy
Sitemap


Credits
Contact us
Directions












TEGNA (TGNA) Gracia C. Martore on Q4 2015 Results - Earnings Call Transcript | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»TEGNA (TGNA) Gracia C. Martore on Q4 2015 Results - Earnings Call TranscriptFeb.16.16 | About: TEGNA (TGNA) TEGNA, Inc. (NYSE:TGNA)
Q4 2015 Earnings Call
February 16, 2016 10:00 am ET
Executives
Jeffrey Heinz - Vice President of Investor Relations
Gracia C. Martore - President and Chief Executive Officer
David T. Lougee - President-TEGNA Media
Matthew W. Ferguson - Chief Executive Officer, CareerBuilder LLC
Alex Vetter - President & Chief Executive Officer, Cars.com LLC
Victoria Dux Harker - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President
Analysts
John Janedis - Jefferies LLC
Bill G. Bird - FBR Capital Markets & Co.
Douglas Middleton Arthur - Huber Research Partners LLC
Marci L. Ryvicker - Wells Fargo Securities LLC
Craig Anthony Huber - Huber Research Partners LLC
Tracy Young - Evercore Group LLC
Barry L. Lucas - Gabelli & Company
Alexia S. Quadrani - JPMorgan Securities LLC
Operator
Good day, everyone, and welcome to TEGNA Fourth Quarter 2015 Earnings Conference Call. This conference is being recorded. Our speakers for today will be Gracia Martore, President and Chief Executive Officer; and Victoria Harker, Chief Financial Officer.
At this time, I'd like to turn the call over to Jeff Heinz, Vice President-Investor Relations. Please go ahead.
Jeffrey Heinz - Vice President of Investor Relations
Thanks, Lindy. Good morning, and welcome to our earnings call and webcast. Today, our President and CEO, Gracia Martore; our CFO, Victoria Harker, and members of our leadership team will review TEGNA's fourth quarter and year-end 2015 results. After their commentary, we'll open up the call for questions. Hopefully, you've had the opportunity to review this morning's press release. If you have not yet reviewed a copy of the release, it's available at tegna.com.
Before we get started, I'd like to remind you that this conference call and webcast include forward-looking statements, and our actual results may differ. Factors that might cause them to differ are outlined in our SEC filings. This presentation also includes certain non-GAAP financial measures. We have provided reconciliations of those measures to the most directly comparable GAAP measures in the press release and on the Investor Relations portion of our website.
With that, let me turn the call over to Gracia.
Gracia C. Martore - President and Chief Executive Officer
Thanks, Jeff. Good morning, everyone, and let me add my welcome to our call. This morning, I'm going to provide some highlights on our overall performance in each of our businesses, and then I'll be turning it over to our business heads. Dave Lougee, President of TEGNA Media; Alex Vetter, CEO of Cars.com; and Matt Ferguson, CEO of CareerBuilder. They'll do a deep dive on each of their respective areas, and then Victoria will touch on the financial highlights for the quarter at the end.
So, let's get right into it. Our progress in our first six months as a highly focused media and digital company has been very strong. When we made the decision to separate our businesses into two, we had a very specific vision in mind for TEGNA. And when we held our Investor Day in June, we were confident in the expectations and projects we laid out for you.
But we know that for all of you, confidence does not necessarily equate to absolute certainty. But in just six short months, we have removed a great deal of those uncertainties including those around our affiliation agreements and retransmission fees, and replaced them with certainties for years to come.
We have even more confidence that we have built a strong foundation that will enable us to capitalize on the rapidly growing demand in the industries we serve. A foundation that best leverages our unique mix of advantages including top-performing assets, scale and partnerships, which give us the tremendous negotiating platform you've seen over the last several months, high margins and consistently strong and dependable cash flows, experienced industry experts running each of our businesses, and a shareholder-focused capital structure. Now, we've leveraged those strengths to create a strong platform that can and will support our growth throughout 2016 and beyond.

So, let's turn to fourth quarter results. Company-wide, as you saw, our revenue totaled about $805 million. Now, there were lots of ins and outs as you probably saw in the press release. TEGNA Media had to overcome a record level of $92 million of political revenue in the fourth quarter last year, which masked otherwise strong results, double-digit increases in retransmission and online revenues and higher core advertising. When you exclude that impact of the unfavorable political spending comparison, TEGNA Media revenues would have been up 12%.
Now, our Digital segment revenue was impacted by the sale of our PointRoll business, which we completed in November. And as you can see on page four of our press release this morning, we show that excluding PointRoll from both the 2014 and 2015 fourth quarter periods and adjusting for exchange rates -- so, on a pro forma constant-currency basis -- Digital segment revenues were over 2% higher.
New product launches and revenue growth at Cars.com, higher revenue per dealer at Cars.com was offset by a revenue decline at CareerBuilder, as it continues its transition towards higher margin, Software-as-a-Service solutions and builds a leadership position in that space.
As you probably saw, expenses in the quarter were down over 4% on a non-GAAP basis. Now, you've heard me say it quarter after quarter, but I think it bears repeating. Our disciplined and prudent approach to managing expenses and ensuring we are optimizing the efficiency of our operations while investing fully in our future will continue to be an important tenet of our strategy while we successfully grow our businesses.
Equally important, EBITDA was strong and our EBITDA margin of 38% was comparable to the fourth quarter of last year despite the absence of substantial higher-margin political spending.
Another important pillar of our strategy is a commitment to a shareholder friendly capital allocation structure. As you saw in October, we announced a $75 million increase in our share repurchase program, bringing it up to $825 million, which will be used over the original three-year term ending in June of 2018. The increase reflects a portion of the proceeds from the sale of our corporate headquarters, which enabled us to increase the return of cash to our shareholders while at the same time strengthening our balance sheet through debt reduction.
As we've noted before, we have more than ample financial flexibility to pay our dividend, repurchase shares based on business conditions and new opportunities, reduce debt and invest in our businesses.
Now I'd like to switch gears for a moment and provide you with a handful of highlights on each of our businesses before turning it over to Dave, Alex and Matt.
As you saw, TEGNA Media achieved revenues in line with our previous guidance driven by, as I noted, core advertising revenue growth, double-digit Digital revenue growth, and very strong retransmission revenue due in part to our recently completed agreements. Additionally, I would be remiss not to mention that TEGNA Media was named Station Group of the Year for 2015 by Broadcasting & Cable based on our outstanding group of local television stations that have fantastic reporting, leading ratings and financial results and an innovative strategic approach. We are very proud of our team and I want to congratulate Dave and his entire team on this well-deserved honor and a very strong year.
2016 is looking to be even more promising for a number of reasons. First, the outcomes of all of our recent network affiliation agreements and several carriage agreements have been consistent with and in some cases exceeded the long-term projections we outlined at our Investor Day in June. Not only are our successful negotiations are testament to the high demand for the engaging content we provide, more importantly, they replace the uncertainty around TEGNA Media that may have existed several months ago with absolute longer-term certainty.

As you saw in January, we reached an agreement with NBC of which we are the largest independent affiliate group. We are thrilled that we are set to deliver NBC's outstanding content from sports to news to primetime for years to come. We also, in the quarter, secured multi-year agreements for continued carriage of TEGNA Media television stations on DIRECTV and AT&T U-verse and Dish Network at more appropriately favorable rates.
And as you know, this summer, we announced the renewal of our agreements with CBS for ten TEGNA Media markets nationwide. TEGNA will participate in the CBS all-access video on-demand service, and we believe that partnering with CBS on both of these fronts ensures that TEGNA audiences have access to must-see content on all their devices.
Now, our rising retransmission revenues and successful negotiations are driven by our track record for delivering best-in-class content. As a result, we've gone one step further and have successfully entered the content creation arena with the T.D. Jakes Show. We took a terrific personality, created and produced a talk show around him, and aired it on four of our local stations. Dave's going to provide some additional details, but from my perspective, this is a testament to our ability to deliver homegrown content, which further diversifies our business and ensures an ongoing stream of quality programming for our audiences.
Yet another reason we are very optimistic about 2016 is our outstanding positioning for the upcoming presidential election as well as the Summer Olympics which will air on NBC. TEGNA is very well-positioned in the key battleground states to take a larger share of political ad spending going forward. As Dave will highlight, we will have a tremendous platform and set of stations in this election. We, of course, expect a significantly more substantial impact in 2016 and are looking forward to a record-breaking year.
Turning now to Cars.com, we continued to see strong revenue growth in the fourth quarter. We fully expect this positive growth trajectory to continue, and we're looking ahead to a strong 2016. We anticipate revenue growth of 10%-plus for the full year through new product development and continued innovation. In fact, we introduced five new products over the course of 2015, each of which continues to show strong returns. Alex will provide further details on our new products and other strategic initiatives in just a few moments.
Moving to CareerBuilder, 2015, as we've said, represented a transformative year. We launched the world's first and only pre-hire platform and new recruitment software products, shifting a majority of our business toward higher growth, stickier higher margin solutions. We also unveiled an exciting new look and feel for our brand that aligns with our new Software-as-a-Service focus strategy. CareerBuilder is fast becoming a leading global HR Software-as-a-Service company with a presence in more than 60 markets worldwide, a move that complements and enhances its successful job board business. Matt is going to provide you with an update on ongoing transition in just a few moments.
But now, let me turn it over to Dave Lougee for his comments on TEGNA Media. Dave?
David T. Lougee - President-TEGNA Media
Thanks, Gracia. Let me begin by giving more color on the certainty that Gracia referenced. We finished 2015 by concluding key strategic negotiations with our largest network partners and some of our largest distribution partners. Specifically, we successfully negotiated retransmission consent agreements covering 58% of our distributors paying subscribers. We also reached a long-term agreement with our largest network partner, NBC, and earlier had reached an agreement with CBS. Both network deals true-up all the TEGNA stations and former Belo stations under single co-terminus contracts.

In the case of CBS, you may recall that the Belo stations agreement went until the beginning of 2017, and that'll continue to operate this year, 2016, under the same financial terms of the previous agreement. In the case of NBC, it's the inverse of CBS. The original TEGNA stations agreement didn't expire until January of 2017 and that contract did not include reverse comp. So, even under our new agreement, those original TEGNA stations will not begin paying reverse comp until January of next year. While the former Belo stations under NBC which were already paying reverse comp under their previous NBC agreement now fall under the financial terms of the new agreement.
So, the net of all these deals is this, between our NBC and CBS deals this year and our ABC agreement the year before, the reverse comp part of our equation is set for years to come with our largest partner, NBC, going out to early 2021. That combined with the 58% of our subs renewed, 31% of which go out to late 2020, means that we have, as Gracia said, certainty and stability around the retransmission piece of our business for the long term and in line with our overall model outlined at Investor Day last summer at the time of our company split.
And a final word on retrans. As I've said before, our trends on subscriber numbers look materially different than most if not all cable channels. And that's for two important reasons. One, given the geographic nature of our portfolio following the Belo acquisition, we're adding homes through population growth.
But the second dynamic is the fact that there appears to be far more cord shavers than cord cutters. MVPDs are moving many of their video subscribers to basic tier packages that only include broadcasters and that has some very key potential long-term implications in ad dollar allocations as there will be a growing gap in the size of distribution for us versus cable channels.
Now, let's turn to 2016 and other topics, and I'll start with political as Gracia referenced. Our footprint for the Primaries like the later General Election is superb. Specifically, between now and March 22, we have Presidential Primaries in 31 of our 38 markets. Our total spending, of course, is hard to predict as anything with this election is hard to predict, as you know, but we know it will end up at record levels for the Primary Season. Between political, net retrans, the Olympics and Digital sales growth, TEGNA Media will have a record year.
Further driving our growth in 2016 is a series of key initiatives we're investing in that leverage the scale we've been able to achieve. First, content innovation. We're taking a development mindset to our core news product. We have eight pilots in production that are not married to traditional news formats. For example, KARE 11 in Minneapolis just recently launched our first pilot, Breaking the News, and we launched that in January. In its first three weeks, it's already the number one new show in its time period.
Second, sales transformation. Through centralized world-class pricing and sophisticated marketing capabilities, we're putting the right tools and the right pitches in the hands of our local clients. In the fourth quarter, we completed the staffing of our centralized sales marketing team called Hatch. With Hatch, we're leveraging our local relationships across all our markets to sell larger marketing-based solutions that go well beyond traditional TV ad dollars. We estimate that for every dollar in advertising in our local markets, there $3 in marketing.
In addition, our new in-house business intelligence team is ramping up quickly, building a proprietary pricing platform to increase the yield and value of TEGNA Media's inventory. Together, we expect the Hatch and proprietary pricing initiatives to generate about $25 million to $30 million of incremental EBITDA this year. And as I outlined last summer at Investor Day, these initiatives will accelerate in 2017 and 2018, and will be accompanied by significant EBITDA growth from other core and adjacent initiatives underway.

Now, let's turn to the original program Gracia referenced. TEGNA Media is the first broadcaster to own 100% of a syndicated daytime property, T.D. Jakes. Beyond the 29 TEGNA Media markets we'll initially launch in, we've signed an additional 13 markets and the number continues to grow. Between Facebook and Twitter, T.D. Jakes has a loyal social following of more than 7 million people, which we will be leveraging for both show content and promotion.
And social media is now at the core of all we do. And in fact, in 2015, we in the aggregate were one of Facebook's top five largest media players, generating more engagement than national players like CNN and New York Times. In fact, KUSA, our Denver station, had the number one Facebook post at any local news organization in 2015, a post that generated more than 4 million interactions.
And on the monetization side, our success in digital content creation offers us new opportunities with off-platform publishers. We've agreed with Facebook to be one of the first local broadcasters to participate in their Instant Articles beta program, and we're engaging in off-platform publishing conversation with many others as well.
And with that, let me turn it over to Matt from CareerBuilder.
Matthew W. Ferguson - Chief Executive Officer, CareerBuilder LLC
Thanks, Dave. 2016 will be an exciting year for CareerBuilder. In addition to rolling out new software solutions, we're elevating our brand visibility through high-profile sponsorships like the CareerBuilder Challenge PGA Tournament, TV advertising and community outreach.
We're excited about the launch of findyourcalling.com. As we know, students today graduate with more than $30,000 in debt CareerBuilder created a free site that enable students to view easy-to-use real-time labor market data for any occupation that matches their interests from job growth projections, salary ranges, and businesses that are hiring to programs that they can apply to today. We're partnering with high schools around the country to help students make better decisions about majors' degrees in school so that they have the outcomes they want once they enter the labor force.
We're also helping to re-skilling up skilled workers of all ages so we can raise income levels of individuals, families, and communities and help close the skills gap in the United States. We recently announced a partnership with Capella University that will enable workers to develop skills in in-demand fields in less than three months at little cost through intensive online training. We're helping workers develop 21st century skills for 21st century jobs such as Web development and information security and believe this will have a lasting impact on the labor market.
Overall, we expect our revenue growth in 2016 to be in the mid-single digits and reach double digits by the end of 2017. As Gracia said, 2015 was a transitional year for us as we made calculated, strategic moves to facilitate more robust revenue growth in the future. We generated just under $700 million in revenue, which was essentially flat year-over-year when you exclude the impact of currency. Did this as we moved away from some low-margin transactional revenue and focused on higher margin platform solutions. I'll give you an example of one of those that I discussed in the last earnings call.
We saw year-over-year decline of $18.6 million in revenue or 2.5 percentage points in 2015 in our employer services unit. We moved from a transactional offering for sourcing and screening candidates to platform-based one that has longer commitments and built-in software.
Our platform source and screen business has grown sequentially over the last several months, and we have enough book business to estimate that March revenue will be up year-over-year around 10%. Based on this trend, we believe we're on track to grow $7 million in this business line in 2016 or about 1 percentage point as we had projected earlier.

In 2015, we also were impacted by moving several thousand low margin transactional advertising accounts from our field sales force to a group that focuses exclusively on these accounts. It was disruptive for some clients and others were no longer a fit. Fortunately, since that move, the business is flat sequentially rather than declining, but it's still weighing on 2015 results. If you remove that currency impact, the source and screen revenue I discussed earlier and the low margin transactional accounts we moved to that specialized group, our business was actually up 4.6% year-over-year in 2015.
Overall, we recognize the job business will continue to experience pricing pressure at the unit level in 2016. However, we included that pricing pressure in our projections. We have a lot of opportunities to go after more job volume though the price per unit will be lower as we move into less skilled jobs. Moreover, we've seen good growth in our software solutions and our résumé database in 2015 and we expect that to continue.
We believe we are, through most of the transition, are set up for growth again in the coming year with a more seasoned sales force. We'll also continue to pursue key acquisitions and roll out new software products. We believe we will see double-digit growth in our SaaS-based products in 2016 as our software solutions line, résumé database and employer services, which will lead to revenue growth in the mid-single digits in 2016 and 10% growth by the end of 2017.
We're excited about the opportunities ahead as we break new ground in the industry. And at this point, I'd like to turn it over to Alex Vetter from Cars.
Alex Vetter - President & Chief Executive Officer, Cars.com LLC
Thank you, Matt. We're very pleased to close out 2015 on such a strong footing. The strong growth has primarily been driven by increased dealer market penetration, new products and increased purchase of display advertising. We achieved solid growth in Q4 as our direct sales and major account teams did a great job throughout the quarter growing revenues by 10%. National revenues were also equally strong, up 12%.
As Gracia mentioned, our robust product pipeline yielded five new products in 2015, delivering customer value and generating revenues. As you know, the total addressable market for service and repair, digital advertising, for franchise dealers is fairly large and generally unaddressed, estimated to about $250 million, and our entry into this area with RepairPal Certified continues to show strong returns.
Event Positions, another one of our 2015 innovations, is a new opportunity with an emphasis on mobile that provides customers an opportunity to dominate a specific targeted geography for a seven-day period. This product has far exceeded our expectations, outperforming projected revenue by 230% in the second half of 2015. This is evidence that Cars.com is delivering solutions that meet our customers' needs.
Looking ahead, our sell and trade solutions allow us to help consumers sell their vehicles quickly and help dealers acquire inventory. They were tested largely in the fourth quarter and based on strong test results, a national launch is scheduled for the first quarter of 2016 with a total addressable market of about $380 million.
At the same time, we've continued to move to a more responsive design on our website, which ultimately provides a more consistent user experience for consumers across all device types. As part of our multifaceted digital advertising strategy, our Cars.com on-the-lot report continues to help quantify the influence that we're having on walk-in shoppers by using geo-fence technology to move beyond basic lead generation measurement.
And through our ad modernization efforts, additional advertising units will be available on the Cars.com mobile properties. This is designed to capture new revenues as consumers continue to migrate to the use of mobile devices.

We've achieved several major accomplishments at this year's North American International Auto Show in Detroit where we hosted our Annual Best of Award Show for manufacturers and other automotive businesses. Selected by the company's editorial experts, these awards are designed to help shoppers across a variety of segments and budgets choose the best vehicle for their needs.
Award categories include the Best of 2016, Best Pickup Truck for 2016, Eco-Friendly Car of the Year, The Family Car of the Year, The Luxury Car of the Year, and The Play Car of the Year. This show is now on its sixth year, and the Best Of Awards has been one of the most talked-about events during the Detroit Auto Show, drawing an audience of over 1,000 attendees.
This year, we hosted CEOs from BMW and Volvo, as well as dozens of C-Suite executives from other car companies and related businesses. In addition, too, our editorial team covered the auto show in full force and published 65 articles and 16 videos highlighting the biggest news from the press days.
Our coverage of the auto show didn't stop there. We unveiled a brand-new online video series called Car Kids, which features two very young reporters hitting the show floor to offer their take on the hottest cars through humor-filled clips and interviews with manufacturer executives. Most importantly, the auto show provides us an opportunity to connect directly with OEMs, and in doing so, we're able to discuss some of the macro trends, expanded diversified revenue stream, and new partnerships opportunities.
We gained valuable insights on the industry. And with a seasonally adjusted annual selling rate of vehicles growing, Tier 2 OEM budgets have increased. We've added coverage from both the sales and support level to help capture these regional dealer association advertising dollars across the country. With targeted messaging becoming much easier to execute, our platforms become a great place to get regionally focused offers and messaging to consumers in the lines of these advertisements.
As manufacturers and agencies began to build teams to analyze the vast amount of data being captured in real time, we're having important conversations about the ways in which data, with its incredibly valuable intent signals, can become productized. Manufacturers and their agencies are looking for more streamlined access to content and data. And if we can provide it to them, we have a win-win opportunity where we can bolster brands and bolster the Cars.com brand in the process.
As you can see, we have several reasons to be optimistic about 2016, and our new products continue to gain traction, and our pipeline of innovative ideas continues to grow. As previously discussed, we expect to deliver revenue growth of 10% or more in 2016 through new product development and continued innovation. While growth may not be evenly dispersed from quarter-to-quarter, we're confident in our projections to remain on target.
With that, let me turn it over to Victoria for a detailed financial review.
Victoria Dux Harker - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President
Thanks, Alex, and good morning, everyone. As Gracia has already mentioned, 2015 was a monumental year for TEGNA. The strength of our businesses during the fourth quarter give us great confidence for 2016 and beyond.
We're very pleased with our fourth quarter financial results despite being up against challenging year-over-year comparisons due to the absence of significant political advertise spending that benefited us during the fourth quarter of 2014.
Before I review our consolidated financial results as well as capital allocation during the quarter, I'd like to highlight several special items which totaled $62 million during the fourth quarter of 2015, with GAAP EPS benefit of $0.16 per share, primarily related to a gain on the sale of the corporate headquarters building, offset in part by workforce restructuring, facility consolidation and impairment charges.

Now, let's briefly review the operating results for the quarter. As a reminder, although I'll be focusing on our non-GAAP performance results today, you can find all of our reported data and comparatives in our press release. Also, as we mentioned during the last earnings call, we converted to a calendar year after the spin of our publishing assets in June. As a result, the fourth quarter results include the impact an additional four days contributing about $10 million to Media segment revenues with an EPS benefit of about $0.01.
During the quarter, with solid performances by both Digital and Media segments, we achieved earnings per share of $0.53. Year-over-year, earnings per share were up 8% driven by organic growth at Cars.com and despite the challenging year-over-year political comparison in TEGNA Media.
Total company revenues of $805 million were down 4% year-over-year. But it's important to note that excluding the impact of record non-presidential political advertising revenue during the prior year, total revenues were in fact up 6% driven by continued growth in retransmission as well as higher Digital and core revenues within the Media segment as well as strong Cars.com revenues.
During the quarter, total company operating expenses of $549 million were lower by 4% over last year, mainly due to seasonally lower quarter – fourth quarter marketing cost at Cars.com and direct cost reductions at CareerBuilder as well as the absence of publishing back office-related stranded cost, which impacted expenses during the fourth quarter of last year.
Now, let's turn to a more detailed review of Media and Digital segments results. As we previously noted, largely due to absence of record non-Presidential political revenues of over $92 million in the fourth quarter of 2014, TEGNA Media revenues of $462 million declined by 7% year-over-year in line with our previous comments on our last call. However, excluding the impacts of political advertising compared to the fourth quarter last year, Media segment revenues would have been up by about 12%.
Retransmission fees boosted by retransmission agreements negotiated during the second half of last year and annual rate increases were up 27% to a historical high of $120 million during the fourth quarter. Beyond this, TEGNA Media digital advertising revenues were also up 15% driven by digital marketing services, which continue to gain traction across all our television stations driven by geo-digital sales, extended reach networks and national digital revenues.
Core advertising was also up by about 7% in part due to the impact of political displacement last year. Our strongest revenue categories for fourth quarter included auto, professional services, entertainment, medical services and home improvement.
Now, focusing on Q1 2016 projections, based on current trends, we expect that growth in Media segments revenues for the first quarter of 2016 compared to the first quarter of 2015 to be in the range of 10% to 12% driven by increases in political advertising, retransmission revenue and digital revenue.
Core advertising is expected to be about the same as the first quarter last year primarily due to the unfavorable impact of Super Bowl advertising, which aired on our 11 CBS stations in 2016 versus our 17 NBC stations in 2015. Excluding the impacts of the Super Bowl, the percentage growth in core advertising is expected to be up in the low-single digits.
During the fourth quarter, the Media segment's operating expenses were up 4% year-over-year due to increased programming costs, investment in our digital sales initiatives including sales force expansion and newly launched product offerings.
During the quarter, Digital segment revenue on a pro-forma basis, excluding the impacts of the sale of PointRoll and adjusting for exchange rates increased by 2% year-over-year, reflecting continued growth at Cars.com offset by revenue declines at CareerBuilder During the quarter, Cars.com revenues increased by 6% in line with our comments in December and our previous earnings call.

These results reflects strong market penetration in direct sales markets, the continued success of new products such as RepairPal Certified and Event Positions, as well as increased purchasing of display advertising by auto manufacturers. These increases were partly offset by the absence of wholesale price increases which occurred in the first quarter of 2016 but occurred during the fourth quarter last year at the time the transaction closed.
As Matt mentioned, excluding the impact of foreign exchange and the (32:05) lower sales of lower margin transaction products, CareerBuilder revenues would have been slightly up year-over-year. With these impacts, CareerBuilder's revenues declined 4% on a constant currency basis.
Digital segment operating expenses were down 2% due to a slight increase in expenses at Cars.com, primarily driven by revenue growth, partly offset by direct cost reductions reflecting lower revenues at CareerBuilder. As a result, we achieved solid adjusted EBITDA of $306 million this quarter for the total company. And our EBITDA margin of 38% was relatively unchanged year-over-year despite the negative impacts of the absence of significantly higher margin political revenues that benefited last year. Our capital investments during the quarter of $44 million reflect our ongoing commitment to our business priorities including digital development, media content, product integration, and platform enhancements as well as several real estate initiatives which produced immediate cost savings.
For the year, $98 million was invested in capital projects including one-time build out impacts of the relocation of our Seattle television station to a more appropriately-sized space. During the quarter, strong cash flow from operations, combined with the proceeds from the sale of our headquarters building and the sales of some small non-core businesses were used to pay off $180 million in 2018 senior notes while funding accelerated share repurchases of $70 million at an average price of $26.78, interest payments of $82 million, and to make investments in business initiatives of $44 million. At the end of the quarter, our long-term debt stood at $4.2 billion and cash on the balance sheet was $129 million.
As we look ahead to 2016, as Gracia and Dave both noted, we expect it to be a banner year. Although we are still in the early stages of the campaign cycle, we project total Media segment revenues to increase in the high-teens to low-20% range for the year. Also, we expect 10%-plus revenue growth at Cars.com with CareerBuilder driving low to mid-single-digit revenue growth in 2016 through the adoption of their SaaS-based suite of products, which ramps throughout the year. All of these drivers will contribute meaningfully to growth in total company revenues in the low- to mid-teen range year-over-year.
On the cost front, we expect total company expenses to increase in the range of 8% to 10%, reflecting primarily higher revenues as we expand in richer content as well as broader products and features across our Media and Digital businesses. Beyond this, we'll see increased programming costs resulting from new affiliation agreements negotiated during the second half of 2015.
Capital expenditures for 2016 are expected to be in the range of $85 million to $95 million, a bit lower than 2015 due to fewer real estate projects planned for the year. Once again in 2106, we expect the majority of our capital expenditures to be in invested in digital development, media content, product integration and platform enhancements.
For 2016, depreciation is projected to be approximately $90 million to $95 million and amortization of $110 million. Interest expense will total nearly $235 million. As previously discussed, the tax rate is anticipated to be roughly in the 35% to 36% range in 2016 though it will vary quarter-to-quarter

With that, I'll turn the call back to Gracia for her closing remarks prior to the Q&A.
Gracia C. Martore - President and Chief Executive Officer
Thanks, Victoria. As you can see from what we've just told you, we've made great progress in just six short months, and we are very confident about our future and our ability to achieve the long-range plan that we laid for you in June.
With that, we will take questions.
Question-and-Answer Session
Operator
Our first question comes from John Janedis. Please go ahead. Your line is open.
John Janedis - Jefferies LLC
Thank you. Dave, thanks for the comments on differentiating between cable networks and your business. So, two related questions. One is, there's also concern around MVPD consolidation. So, did you see any unusual impact from the AT&T DIRECTV renewal? And then second, do you have any visibility on the ratio of cord shavers relative to cord cutters?
David T. Lougee - President-TEGNA Media
So, let me take the second one first. I would just take up – John, I would just say, look at public numbers out there relative to what MVPDs are reporting relative to their sub losses or in some cases sub gains versus individual cable channels. We don't have obviously ourselves any unique data around that other than to point out the fact that there clearly is a significant distinction.
And your other question, I apologize, John, was...
Gracia C. Martore - President and Chief Executive Officer
MVPD consolidation.
John Janedis - Jefferies LLC
MVPD consolidation around AT&T and DIREC.
David T. Lougee - President-TEGNA Media
Yeah. So, I would just simply say generically, no. We are – given our scale, we're able to negotiate appropriately with all current and future consolidated players.
John Janedis - Jefferies LLC
Great. Thanks. And then just separately, maybe from Matt or for Gracia, it's unusual to see expense controls for a company with growing digital assets. So with some of the changes at CareerBuilder, does the expense decline continue? And is the transition to SaaS consistent in terms of the timeline? And then I guess given some of the macro headlines, is there any evidence of a slowdown in hiring as you've gone through the renewal process?
Gracia C. Martore - President and Chief Executive Officer
I'll ask Matt to take the question around slowdown in hiring. But with respect to the expense side of the equation, we have, as we indicated previously, been in fact investing in our businesses. And so, for instance, we've talked about with CareerBuilder in the latter half of 2015 investing $10 million to $15 million in additional sales and development resources.
And we're going to be investing over and above our normal expense side those kinds of dollars as well. But then, there are other areas that we are always looking to create efficiencies around to let the Cars, for instance, take advantage of some of the procurement activities, et cetera, et cetera, that don't in any way touch the business from a growth perspective, but really just make it a more efficient business because of the scale of what we all can buy as one company.
So, I think you'll see as we go into 2016, I think we've provided some guidance on the expense side. You'll see that we are continuing to ramp our investment in those areas that will propel growth into the future.
Matt, do you want to take the question on hiring?
Matthew W. Ferguson - Chief Executive Officer, CareerBuilder LLC
Yeah. Obviously, the stock market has been volatile and that creates a little bit of uncertainty. I don't see any changes in employers hiring right now. And I think when you look at the last couple years, they've probably underinvested (39:14) and bringing on new initiatives.
And as a result, in the skilled labor market, it's just very tight right now. I don't think that's changed at all even with the uncertainty going into the first quarter. I did see a few contracts that were delayed maybe a few weeks. So, they were some of the margins decisions that were delayed that may have been unrelated to the economy or maybe it was tied to the economy, but nothing significant right now. And I think companies are still trying to figure out how to bring on that critical talent in the skilled areas, and that has not changed.

Gracia C. Martore - President and Chief Executive Officer
You might mention, Matt, the number of contracts that you...
Matthew W. Ferguson - Chief Executive Officer, CareerBuilder LLC
Yeah. If you just look – even if you look at the long-term contracts that we've signed, in 2015, we signed 825 contracts that were 24 months or longer in duration. That was up from 310 contracts in 2014 that were 24 months. What we're seeing right now – and that trend is continuing as I look at 2016. We're still paying a good number of multi-year deals in the first part of the year. And so, there is a great deal of commitment by customers (40:23) especially to the software solutions, John, where they see that being a critical part of their pre-hire strategies and they want to make long-term commitments to that.
John Janedis - Jefferies LLC
Thank you.
Victoria Dux Harker - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President
John, just to expand one little piece of what (40:35) as I look at the budgets for the fourth quarter as well as (40:39) spending as budgeted and as planned because we're spending on sales and development resources. We're not getting ahead of that with marketing resources. So we very much expect that to continue to ramp as the year go – goes on. It's really not expense controls per se.
John Janedis - Jefferies LLC
Thanks a lot.
Gracia C. Martore - President and Chief Executive Officer
Thanks, John.
Operator
And we'll take our next question from Bill Bird. Please go ahead. Your line is open.
Bill G. Bird - FBR Capital Markets & Co.
Thank you. Good morning. First on Cars, just based on the figures given, it look like affiliate sales were down in the fourth quarter. I was just wondering if you could talk about what's happening in that distribution channel. And then, secondly, at CareerBuilder, do you still expect revenue growth to be positive in the first quarter? And could you talk a little bit about trends in advertising and résumé database? Thank you.
Alex Vetter - President & Chief Executive Officer, Cars.com LLC
Sure, Bill. Bill, this is Alex Vetter at Cars.com. I think one of the things we're seeing as you are aware that we cycled through a one-time wholesale price increase last year. And so our wholesale channel model continues to work to cycle through that price change in their local markets, which obviously is challenging for them, but they've largely gotten through it. And we see them getting back to the growth rate towards in 2016.
Gracia C. Martore - President and Chief Executive Officer
Yeah. And also you may recall, Bill, that we had put a price increase in place on October 1, 2014 when we first acquired Cars. And we've said that we were going to get them back on the cycle of January 1 increases. So, the fourth quarter, particularly affiliates were impacted – affiliate revenue was impacted by that absence of a price increase. So, we have to cycle that price increase from the prior year but...
Matthew W. Ferguson - Chief Executive Officer, CareerBuilder LLC
Yeah. On your question on Q1, we expect it will be down a little bit year-over-year and that will be up starting in Q2. On the – I think you also asked a question about résumés. If we look at total registrations, total registrations in the United States are almost at 59 million, and that's up 8% year-over-year.
And then résumés in the month of January were up single digits, new résumés. So, that's new résumés being added in that month versus the previous year in that month were up in the kind of the mid-single-digit range year-over-year.
Gracia C. Martore - President and Chief Executive Officer
Let me just add a little color to what Matt said with respect to the growth rate. I don't think we talked about CareerBuilder going to a positive growth rate in the first quarter. Because if you look at the first quarter 2015, their revenues were actually up, I think, about a little -- around 4%. And it was really --preceded the intentional review that they did and strategic review they did of the relationships.

And so, they won't cycle that in the first quarter. Although we'll see some nice gains in some other areas that will lead to what Matt has indicated. But then, we should see, as we've cycled those activities, those gains begin to clearly ramp in the remaining three quarters to get us to the guidance we gave you. And we have some good fairly decent line of sight on that.
Bill G. Bird - FBR Capital Markets & Co.
And so, just going back to Cars, so effectively, I'm familiar with the year-ago affiliate price increase. So, your pricing effectively was flat. And so I'm wondering, why were affiliate revenues down?
Gracia C. Martore - President and Chief Executive Officer
Yeah, we don't give specifics with respect to the performance of our affiliates for obvious reasons. What I can tell you is, frankly, we have some affiliates that are just doing a fantastic job in some very specific markets and we're incredibly pleased with their performance. Unfortunately, we have an affiliate group or so that in some markets are not doing the job that either they should do for themselves or are contributing. But we are working very diligently with those underperformers to give them some opportunities to pick up that performance, because it isn't just money for Cars, it's money for them. And I can't imagine that they would not want to have those revenues come into their coffers as well. So, it's a combination of those two things.
Bill G. Bird - FBR Capital Markets & Co.
Great. Thank you.
Operator
And we'll go next to Doug Arthur. Please go ahead. Your line is open.
Douglas Middleton Arthur - Huber Research Partners LLC
Yeah. Thanks. Two questions on Cars. Gracia, I believe going back to the Analyst Day, you or Victoria talked about a long-term margin guide for Cars of 38% to 41%. I'm wondering if you can just talk about, A) is that still in play; and B) kind of how do you see the ramp? And then, Alex, you talked about a few adjacencies such as the repair market that you're actively in now. Are there any other adjacencies that long term you're looking at? Thanks.
Victoria Dux Harker - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President
Yeah. Just to answer your first question relative to your EBITDA margin, we exited 2015 very much on that trajectory. And based on the numbers that we're seeing for the 2016 budget, we're accelerating towards that, we expect to be within if not at the higher end of that range. So, we're very confident on that.
Gracia C. Martore - President and Chief Executive Officer
Yeah. We are – we made – Alex and his team made great progress on that, obviously helped by the new affiliation agreements, but also in a lot of the new product development, et cetera, that they've done that has gained some traction. So we feel very confident of that EBITDA trajectory.
Alex Vetter - President & Chief Executive Officer, Cars.com LLC
Yeah. And in terms of the adjacencies, our move to singular ownership last year really allowed us to reinvest in our future, which is why we were able to build five new commercial products in one year. Historically, that may be have only have only been one, maybe two, at best. In all of those products, I think are still in the early stages of growth, and we expect those continue to generate returns for the business, both in 2016 and beyond.
I think, obviously, we've built a platform model that is highly scalable. We've got a very strong brand both with consumers and the trade industry. And so, I think that opens up a lot of opportunities for us to explore new markets that we can leverage our expertise and our scale. I don't want to get into those specifically right now, but we see a lot of opportunities to reinvest into the business on an ongoing basis.
Douglas Middleton Arthur - Huber Research Partners LLC

Okay; great. Thank you.
Gracia C. Martore - President and Chief Executive Officer
Thanks, Doug.
Operator
And our next question comes from Marci Ryvicker. Please go ahead. Your line is open.
Marci L. Ryvicker - Wells Fargo Securities LLC
Thanks. Victoria, you gave one piece of information on the extra four days. That's the $10 million of incremental Media segment revenue. Can you give us the EBITDA for that segment as well as the Digital revenue and EBITDA that came from those four extra days?
Victoria Dux Harker - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President
Well, Digital is largely already on a calendar basis. So, the $10 million is totally Media-specific, and it is just the four days.
Marci L. Ryvicker - Wells Fargo Securities LLC
Okay.
Victoria Dux Harker - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President
And (48:10) about a $0.01 of EPS, so about $4-million-EBITDA-ish.
Marci L. Ryvicker - Wells Fargo Securities LLC
And then, what – core was up $7 million.
Victoria Dux Harker - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President
Right.
Marci L. Ryvicker - Wells Fargo Securities LLC
I assume that that is also impacted by the four extra days. What would the core have been apples-to-apples?
Gracia C. Martore - President and Chief Executive Officer
I think the core apples-to-apples would have been about 4-ish – low to low-single digits.
Marci L. Ryvicker - Wells Fargo Securities LLC
Okay. So low-single for core. And then, in terms of CareerBuilder, we've got...
Gracia C. Martore - President and Chief Executive Officer
I'm sorry, Marci. Remembering that in October-November, we had displacement, and December really was our first real month to look at. And frankly, we were very pleased with the way core ended the quarter in a very positive way.
Marci L. Ryvicker - Wells Fargo Securities LLC
Okay. And then, we got sort of two comments on CareerBuilder. One was that revenue will be up low single to mid-single in 2016 and then we got a mid-single. So, I guess we're trying to understand...
Gracia C. Martore - President and Chief Executive Officer
Mid-singles.
Marci L. Ryvicker - Wells Fargo Securities LLC
So you're ending near mid-single or all of 2016 will be up mid-single?
Gracia C. Martore - President and Chief Executive Officer
The year will be up mid-singles.
Marci L. Ryvicker - Wells Fargo Securities LLC
Okay.
Gracia C. Martore - President and Chief Executive Officer
Each quarter, however, will have it – as I said, the first quarter will be lower.
Marci L. Ryvicker - Wells Fargo Securities LLC
Okay.
Gracia C. Martore - President and Chief Executive Officer
It will ramp and will get to an overall year of mid-singles.
Marci L. Ryvicker - Wells Fargo Securities LLC
Okay. Perfect. And then one last question, in the quarter, CareerBuilder was down 4.2% constant currency. Do you have that number including foreign exchange?
Victoria Dux Harker - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President
It would have been about another point.
Matthew W. Ferguson - Chief Executive Officer, CareerBuilder LLC
Yeah.
Victoria Dux Harker - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President
About 5%.
Matthew W. Ferguson - Chief Executive Officer, CareerBuilder LLC
Right at 5%.
Victoria Dux Harker - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President
Yeah.
Marci L. Ryvicker - Wells Fargo Securities LLC
Okay. Thank you.
Gracia C. Martore - President and Chief Executive Officer
Thanks.
Operator
And your next question comes from Craig Huber. Please go ahead. Your line is open.
Craig Anthony Huber - Huber Research Partners LLC
Yes. Good morning. Just first a point of clarification, I believe last quarter you had other assets line. Is that all discontinued or some of those assets move into the media broadcasting segments? What happened there, please?
Gracia C. Martore - President and Chief Executive Officer

It's all discontinued ops.
Craig Anthony Huber - Huber Research Partners LLC
Okay. And secondly, Gracia or someone, can you just speak a little bit further about the 5.7% growth in Cars.com? You blamed part of that on the lack of a price increase that's delayed by three months. Historically though, isn't your price increases more like in the 2% to 3% range? Was there anything else that was impacted that was a more economic-driven, growth rate there, well, I thought terrible, it's a lot lower than mid-teens, has been historically adjusting for affiliate contracts, stuff like that.
Gracia C. Martore - President and Chief Executive Officer
First of all, we didn't blame it. We just are providing the various points of the impacts in the fourth quarter. We had indicated that we expected that kind of growth in the fourth quarter that's not unusual to have variances quarter-to-quarter. And so, the performance at Cars in the fourth quarter met all of our expectations. Obviously, there was that pricing delay that took it to January 1.
We are very comfortable based on the trajectory of what we are seeing right now that – as both Alex and I have said, that we will achieve 10%-plus revenue growth for the full year in 2016. Again, that won't be linear. There will be some quarters where it will be high-singles, there'll be some quarters where it will be low-double digits. But overall, for the full year, it will be – we anticipate it will be the 10%-plus that we have outlined.
Craig Anthony Huber - Huber Research Partners LLC
What else --
Matthew W. Ferguson - Chief Executive Officer, CareerBuilder LLC
Craig, I just like to add one point of clarification. It's well recognized that over the past few years, we've reduced our reliance on our channel partners in favor of building out our direct sales. So, our affiliate partners only represent sub-30% of our business. And if you look at the fourth quarter, both our direct, our major accounts, international sales teams all eclipsed 10% growth for the fourth quarter. And I think that really signals sort of the strength in the business that being the majority of the revenue coming in through those three channels.
Craig Anthony Huber - Huber Research Partners LLC
Is there anything else though that you could specifically talk to that caused a slower growth rate in the fourth quarter? I'm not trying to beat a dead horse here. I'm just trying to understand why the volatility.
Gracia C. Martore - President and Chief Executive Officer
With the price delay, that gets you to high-single digits. And what we've talked about is a business that will grow, depending on the quarter, high-single digits or low-double digits. So, it is not inconsistent with the trajectory that we have talked about. So, the reason why we're, I think, struggling with it is because that's a perfectly within the kind of guidance that we've given result for that particular quarter.
Victoria Dux Harker - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President
Yeah. It was right on top of the numbers we gave in December...
Gracia C. Martore - President and Chief Executive Officer
Right.
Victoria Dux Harker - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President
...as well as our previous earnings call. So from our perspective, it landed right exactly where we had anticipated.
Craig Anthony Huber - Huber Research Partners LLC
Right. Fair enough. My other question, Gracia, can you – maybe I missed this, but your cost outlook for your TV group for this new year, maybe excluding the new affiliate contracts. What should investors sort of expect there for this new year, please?
Gracia C. Martore - President and Chief Executive Officer
I think we had talked about an unexpected growth rate in sort of the 5% kind of range relative to program expenses and those types of things as some of it is going into content development, a number of the new initiatives that Dave talked about. Obviously, linear with revenue as that ramps through the year. So it won't be exactly every quarter.

David T. Lougee - President-TEGNA Media
And some increased costs relative to political advertising as well.
Gracia C. Martore - President and Chief Executive Officer
Right.
Craig Anthony Huber - Huber Research Partners LLC
Was that up 5%, excluding the network comp bump or including that?
Gracia C. Martore - President and Chief Executive Officer
No, that is including. That was the guidance you gave for the full year for TEGNA Media. So that would include every element of it.
Victoria Dux Harker - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President
Right.
Craig Anthony Huber - Huber Research Partners LLC
Great. Thank you.
Operator
And we'll take our next question from Tracy Young. Please go ahead. Your line is open.
Tracy Young - Evercore Group LLC
Yeah. Hi. Just following up on your comments about broadcasting, I believe you gave guidance for the quarter of about 1%, and it sounds like you came in close to the 4%.
So just wondering what the change might have been through the course of the quarter. And then also with auto up, there is some concern among investors that we're reaching peak SAAR, and so what that could mean for auto advertising. Thanks.
Gracia C. Martore - President and Chief Executive Officer
Auto was up, and I can only attribute the higher-than-expectation core advertising on the great efforts by our sales group, additional products that they're selling on the digital side, the growth of our digital products and full solutions that they're able to offer their clients.
But, Dave, I don't know if there's anything more specific.
David T. Lougee - President-TEGNA Media
I want to make sure I understood the question. Was it a question about the – on the four versus the one. Could you repeat the question, please? I'm sorry.
Tracy Young - Evercore Group LLC
Yeah. Just wondering, I know that there were some, maybe not as much visibility going into the quarter given some of the crowding out from the prior year. Just the guidance originally was 1% and you came in, I guess, 4% excluding those four days.
David T. Lougee - President-TEGNA Media
Yes. So, to Gracia's point, I mean, we did a nice job on the local sales efforts. Auto was good and strong as we had hoped. And so, I just put it there. It's a little – always tough to estimate, and we're up against the political quarter the previous year sometimes on the numbers. So, that's what I attribute it to.
Gracia C. Martore - President and Chief Executive Officer
Yeah. And it wasn't necessarily political. We had some political, but that wasn't a big swing factor. It was really in the core part of the business.
David T. Lougee - President-TEGNA Media
That's right.
Tracy Young - Evercore Group LLC
Okay. Thanks.
Operator
And we'll go next to Barry Lucas. Please go ahead. Your line is open.
Barry L. Lucas - Gabelli & Company
Thanks and good morning. Just a couple on the TV side. Dave, could you set a baseline for either 2012 or 2014 political. And we're looking, obviously, for a bumper crop, but any color you can provide within the Primaries on maybe the Donald's spending on that.
David T. Lougee - President-TEGNA Media
Yeah. I think, it's really difficult for us to break out spending, frankly, by candidates or – other than just to say, in the aggregate, that the total dollars in the system on a Presidential-to-Presidential year compared to 2012 are a lot larger. We know that from public information obviously out there and spending we're already seeing in South Carolina. So, we have every reason to know that combination of primary plus general for 2016 should be significantly ahead of 2012.
Gracia C. Martore - President and Chief Executive Officer
But to put the baseline for you, Barry, we did, call it, $197 million of political in 2012, the last Presidential election year, we did 159 million in 2014. So that kind of gives you a baseline. And that includes – that's a pro forma number including the Belo stations and the London stations.

Barry L. Lucas - Gabelli & Company
Right. Thanks. And in the past, you've talked a little bit about what the trajectory of retrans could look like. I was hoping you can take the opportunity to do the same for 2016.
Gracia C. Martore - President and Chief Executive Officer
Yeah. I think on our last call we talked in 25% to 30% range. I think we feel much more comfortable at the high end of that range, percentage increase year-over-year in total.
Barry L. Lucas - Gabelli & Company
Right. Okay. So without putting any words in your mouth, Gracia, how comfortable when you now look at the affiliation agreements that are in place and the renewals with the MVPDs that we're going to cycle healthy net retrans gains over the length of those two comparable agreements?
Gracia C. Martore - President and Chief Executive Officer
I feel extremely good about 2016. I think we've talked about with respect to 2017 we have the big – bigger cliff with our NBC stations, the former Gannett NBC stations coming up. So, there will be a blip there. But as you heard at Investor Day, Dave and his team, through a number of initiatives, are looking to fill that gap in 2017. So, you might not see it in the – you might see the reverse retransmission hit, but we anticipate that that will be offset by the performance of the initiatives that Dave has outlined. And then we feel good about the outer years when we don't have that cliff that we have from the NBC station.
Victoria Dux Harker - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President
And just to reiterate, it's all very well, if not at the high end, of what we have provided at Investor Day post all of those negotiations.
Barry L. Lucas - Gabelli & Company
Terrific. Thank you so much for the color.
Gracia C. Martore - President and Chief Executive Officer
Thanks, Barry. I think we have got time for maybe one more question.
Operator
And our next question comes from Alexia Quadrani. Please go ahead. Your line is open.
Alexia S. Quadrani - JPMorgan Securities LLC
Thank you. Actually, Gracia, just following up on your comment just now about this sort of a longer term trajectory of retrans. I guess my question is, one, you had this impressive retrans versus last couple of years; looks like it'll continue this year obviously, given your guide. But when you cycle through these new renewals, I guess, what sort of rate should we – what sort of is a good run rate we should consider for retrans growth sort of in the outer years, given that these contracts seem very long term?
Gracia C. Martore - President and Chief Executive Officer
Well, the retrans agreements aren't very long term. We still have a mix of dates on those. So, by the time we get to those outer years, we'll be having another opportunity to readjust our rates to the market.
But, Dave, why don't you add that?
David T. Lougee - President-TEGNA Media
Yeah. I'll just say, to Gracia's point, while I reference that with 30% of our subs going out several years, the majority of them do not. And in fact, we have a very large percentage of the top line, sub part of it, up within the end – toward the end of this year. So a significant amount. So, we've got far more opportunity to continue to grow the top line piece.
Alexia S. Quadrani - JPMorgan Securities LLC
And it sounds like from, I guess, what you're suggesting that there is still a fair amount of – a big gap between I guess what you deserve to get and what you guys are currently being paid.
Gracia C. Martore - President and Chief Executive Officer
We definitely believe that to be the case.
Alexia S. Quadrani - JPMorgan Securities LLC
And then just to follow up quickly on the advertising side, I believe you gave the advertising core outlook for the first quarter, and I apologize I missed it. But any color you can give for the full-year and any sort of I guess color if you're seeing or assuming any kind of macro weakness in your budget and your guide?

Gracia C. Martore - President and Chief Executive Officer
No. I think Victoria went through that.
Victoria Dux Harker - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President
We answer the first quarter relatively.
Gracia C. Martore - President and Chief Executive Officer
But the full year, the full year.
Alexia S. Quadrani - JPMorgan Securities LLC
Yeah.
Gracia C. Martore - President and Chief Executive Officer
I think we've talked about it being in the 20%-ish.
Victoria Dux Harker - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President
Yeah, in the low-20%s.
Gracia C. Martore - President and Chief Executive Officer
Low-20%s for the full year. Total revenues for TEGNA Media. We obviously have built in an economy that continues to kind of stumble along. We haven't built in any big recovery. We conversely haven't built in a recession that would be deep and extended in period of time. Obviously, there are levers we would pull if something like that happened. But we haven't anticipated that the economy is going to get any better from here. It's kind of just a bumbling along economy.
Alexia S. Quadrani - JPMorgan Securities LLC
Okay. Thank you very much.
Gracia C. Martore - President and Chief Executive Officer
No offense to the Fed.
Alexia S. Quadrani - JPMorgan Securities LLC
Thank you.
Gracia C. Martore - President and Chief Executive Officer
Okay. I think that we've taken our full allotment of time. Thank you all for joining us today.
Operator
Ladies and gentlemen, that does conclude today's program. You may disconnect at this time. Thank you and have a great day.
Copyright policy: All transcripts on this site are the copyright of Seeking Alpha. However, we view them as an important resource for bloggers and journalists, and are excited to contribute to the democratization of financial information on the Internet. (Until now investors have had to pay thousands of dollars in subscription fees for transcripts.) So our reproduction policy is as follows: You may quote up to 400 words of any transcript on the condition that you attribute the transcript to Seeking Alpha and either link to the original transcript or to www.SeekingAlpha.com. All other use is prohibited.
THE INFORMATION CONTAINED HERE IS A TEXTUAL REPRESENTATION OF THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S CONFERENCE CALL, CONFERENCE PRESENTATION OR OTHER AUDIO PRESENTATION, AND WHILE EFFORTS ARE MADE TO PROVIDE AN ACCURATE TRANSCRIPTION, THERE MAY BE MATERIAL ERRORS, OMISSIONS, OR INACCURACIES IN THE REPORTING OF THE SUBSTANCE OF THE AUDIO PRESENTATIONS. IN NO WAY DOES SEEKING ALPHA ASSUME ANY RESPONSIBILITY FOR ANY INVESTMENT OR OTHER DECISIONS MADE BASED UPON THE INFORMATION PROVIDED ON THIS WEB SITE OR IN ANY TRANSCRIPT. USERS ARE ADVISED TO REVIEW THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S AUDIO PRESENTATION ITSELF AND THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S SEC FILINGS BEFORE MAKING ANY INVESTMENT OR OTHER DECISIONS.
If you have any additional questions about our online transcripts, please contact us at: transcripts@seekingalpha.com. Thank you!
About this article:ExpandTagged: Services, Broadcasting - TV, TranscriptsError in this transcript? Let us know.Contact us to add your company to our coverage or use transcripts in your business.Learn more about Seeking Alpha transcripts here.Follow SA Transcripts and get email alertsSearch TranscriptThis transcriptFindAll transcriptsFindCompare To:All TGNA TranscriptsOther Companies in this sector





Services including Restaurant and Retail Stocks | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Services including Restaurant and Retail StocksTime For Chipotle To Replicate McDonald's PlaybookCMG• Today, 9:43 AM • Sabra Capital Partners•1 CommentScorpio Bulkers Inc 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesSALT• Today, 9:23 AM • SA TranscriptsManpowerGroup Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesMAN• Today, 8:58 AM • SA TranscriptsThe Accelerating Death Of Sears RetailSHLD• Today, 8:58 AM • Elephant Analytics•6 CommentsWhy Are Investors Expecting More From PriceSmart?PSMT• Today, 8:36 AM • Vince MartinThe Walt Disney Co. - A DCF AnalysisDIS• Today, 8:19 AM • Saanal Deshpande•7 CommentsShould You Invest In TJX Shares?TJX• Today, 8:18 AM • Canadian Dividend Growth Investor•1 CommentSome Thoughts On A Discovery-Scripps MergerDISCA, SNI• Today, 8:09 AM • Kenra Investors•1 CommentJ.C. Penney: Diversifying Its OfferingsJCP• Today, 7:18 AM • Elephant Analytics•6 CommentsGameStop: Deeply Undervalued Company Or A Value Trap?GME• Today, 6:46 AM • Daniel Schönberger•5 CommentsFoot Locker Keeps Getting BetterFL• Today, 6:25 AM • Nicholas D. Rempel•4 CommentsAlibaba: My Valuation Of The StockBABA• Today, 6:15 AM • Kenra Investors•11 CommentsBuffalo Wild Wings: A Path Back To RelevanceBWLD• Today, 5:54 AM • Avi Danda•1 CommentTungsten Corp. 2017 Q4 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesTUNG• Today, 4:02 AM • SA TranscriptsOf Chipotle, Sino-Global, Valuation And Glengarry Glen Ross?CMG• Today, 2:00 AM • The Nattering Naybob•9 CommentsRyanair Holdings PLC 2017 Q4 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesRYAAY• Today, 1:50 AM • SA Transcripts•1 CommentWild Ride For DryShipsDRYS• Today, 12:54 AM • Morningsidepark•6 CommentsDryShips - CEO'S Voting Rights Down To 3 Million. Shareholders Gain Control?DRYS• Today, 12:08 AM • Research & Investment•27 CommentsSherwin-Williams: Strong Q2 Thanks To Newly Acquired ValsparSHW• Yesterday, 5:02 PM • Sure Dividend•4 CommentsTJX Isn't Getting 'Amazoned,' But It Still Isn't Cheap EitherTJX• Yesterday, 3:32 PM • Shareholders Unite•11 CommentsCan Teekay Corporation Rescue Teekay Offshore PartnersTK• Yesterday, 3:10 PM • Long Player•43 CommentsKansas City Southern Bucks Last Week's Class I Sell-OffKSU• Yesterday, 11:07 AM • James Sands•3 CommentsDelta - Life Isn't FairDAL• Yesterday, 7:19 AM • Michael Rogus•30 CommentsDunkin' Brands Discounted Cash Flow Valuation: Buying OpportunityDNKN• Yesterday, 6:57 AM • Sean Warneke•4 CommentsAvoid Sears Stock Like The PlagueSHLD• Yesterday, 6:36 AM • Christopher Yuen•55 CommentsAthenahealth - Beauty Is In The Eye Of The BeholderATHN• Yesterday, 4:04 AM • Christopher Speetzen•1 CommentL.B. Foster - Prices Have Recovered But Remain UndervaluedFSTR• Yesterday, 3:23 AM • DTF Capital•3 CommentsIndependent News & Media Plc - Has The World Really Ended?Editors' Pick • INNZF• Sat, Jul. 22, 11:14 AM • Philip Ryan•7 CommentsBuy Chipotle Stock Amid Recent Outbreak FearsCMG• Sat, Jul. 22, 8:48 AM • Christopher Yuen•135 CommentsGreene King: Is The 5% Yield Enough?GKNGY, GRKGF• Sat, Jul. 22, 8:36 AM • Mark Dockray•10 CommentsFundamentals And Technicals Agree On W.W. Grainger StockGWW• Fri, Jul. 21, 7:35 PM • Aleksandar Vichev•12 CommentsThe Long Case For LiLACEditors' Pick • LILA• Fri, Jul. 21, 4:00 PM • Stephen SarokiThe Short Case For Singapore Press HoldingsEditors' Pick • SGPRY, SGPRF• Fri, Jul. 21, 4:00 PM • Warren Chan•2 CommentsBed & Bath Beyond: A No Brainer, Management Optionality UndervaluedBBBY• Fri, Jul. 21, 3:24 PM • Kario-Paul Brown•11 CommentsComcast And Liberty Global Invest In Integrate's Demand MarTechLBTYA• Fri, Jul. 21, 3:24 PM • Donovan Jones•2 CommentsWhy Air France-KLM Is In A BubbleAFRAF• Fri, Jul. 21, 3:23 PM • Wubbe Bos•4 CommentsKroger's Recent Price Weakness Might Just Be A Good LossKR• Fri, Jul. 21, 3:00 PM • Chuck Carnevale•79 CommentsWag Of Approval For PetIQPETQ• Fri, Jul. 21, 1:56 PM • Don Dion•4 CommentsGNC: I'm Not Bluffing With Pocket DeucesGNC• Fri, Jul. 21, 1:37 PM • Courage & Conviction Investing•56 CommentsDynaCert: Promising To Boost Transportation Business Profit MarginsDYFSF• Fri, Jul. 21, 1:00 PM • Research & Investment•6 CommentsNew Stocks In Exec Comp And ROIC Model Portfolio: July 2017FL• Fri, Jul. 21, 12:26 PM • David Trainer•1 CommentDollar Tree: Paying The Growth Premium Is Not Worth The RiskDLTR• Fri, Jul. 21, 11:43 AM • Samuel Smith•10 CommentsMoody's Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesMCO• Fri, Jul. 21, 11:42 AM • SA TranscriptsNetflix: Does Growth Justify The Valuation?NFLX• Fri, Jul. 21, 11:31 AM • Hudson River Capital Research•66 CommentsSprouts Is Not Sprouting HigherSFM, WFM• Fri, Jul. 21, 10:45 AM • Martin Hausman•5 CommentsLowes: Contrarian Play Post Sears/Amazon DealLOW• Fri, Jul. 21, 10:41 AM • L&F Capital Management•11 CommentseBay: Results Bemuse The StreetEBAY• Fri, Jul. 21, 10:30 AM • Quad 7 Capital•19 CommentsDividend Champion On Clearance Rack And In My PortfolioTGT• Fri, Jul. 21, 9:48 AM • Colorado Wealth Management Fund•221 CommentsA Bidding War For Advisory Board CompanyABCO• Fri, Jul. 21, 9:27 AM • Ensemble CapitalPapa Murphy's Holdings: An Overlooked Competitor In A Crowded SpaceEditors' Pick • FRSH• Fri, Jul. 21, 9:19 AM • Dining Stocks Online•13 CommentsHome Depot - Don't Panic, BuyHD• Fri, Jul. 21, 9:00 AM • Leo Nelissen•30 CommentsDineEquity And Its 9% DividendDIN• Fri, Jul. 21, 8:51 AM • Prescient Investment Analysis•8 CommentsNo Need To Ditch UnitedUAL• Fri, Jul. 21, 8:51 AM • Detroit Bear•2 CommentsKansas City Southern 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesKSU• Fri, Jul. 21, 8:33 AM • SA TranscriptsDryShips Inc.: Reverse Split Selling Is Not Over YetDRYS• Fri, Jul. 21, 8:30 AM • Morningsidepark•98 CommentsHome Depot: What Changed?HD• Fri, Jul. 21, 2:24 AM • Joseph Harry•31 CommentsDunkin' Brands: A No-Frills 20% OpportunityDNKN• Fri, Jul. 21, 12:29 AM • Black Coral Research•6 CommentsWill No Direct Competition Help WWE Offset Declining Viewership?WWE• Thu, Jul. 20, 5:43 PM • Jeremy McKinzie•7 CommentseBay Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesEBAY• Thu, Jul. 20, 5:01 PM • SA TranscriptsHome Depot: A Dividend Growth Stock With A 29% Increase This YearHD• Thu, Jul. 20, 3:29 PM • Ploutos Investing•15 CommentsDisney Is A Buy, But Not Because Of Spider-ManDIS• Thu, Jul. 20, 2:54 PM • Black Coral Research•13 CommentsAutoZone Is The Deal Of The CenturyAZO• Thu, Jul. 20, 2:27 PM • Bank On Insight•37 CommentsUnion Pacific Surprises AgainUNP• Thu, Jul. 20, 1:35 PM • Jonathan Weber•25 CommentsNetflix's Success Driven By What Drives Other Tech Giants' SuccessesNFLX• Thu, Jul. 20, 1:16 PM • Gary Bourgeault•22 CommentsDryShips: Don't EvenDRYS• Thu, Jul. 20, 12:32 PM • Daniel Jones•69 CommentsNetflix: Warning Flags FlyingNFLX• Thu, Jul. 20, 12:23 PM • Michael Wiggins De Oliveira•32 CommentsGet On Board These Rail StocksNSC, KSU, GWR• Thu, Jul. 20, 12:21 PM • Zacks Investment Research•2 CommentsScholastic Corporation 2017 Q4 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesSCHL• Thu, Jul. 20, 11:19 AM • SA TranscriptsThe Sherwin-Williams Company 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesSHW• Thu, Jul. 20, 10:57 AM • SA TranscriptsOmnicom Group Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesOMC• Thu, Jul. 20, 10:03 AM • SA TranscriptsRite Aid: Don't Be FooledRAD• Thu, Jul. 20, 9:55 AM • Kumquat Research•157 CommentsDryShips' All-Time High - $1.47 Billion A Share?DRYS• Thu, Jul. 20, 9:49 AM • Research & Investment•48 CommentsCSX Pullback After Second Quarter Earnings Is JustifiedCSX• Thu, Jul. 20, 9:16 AM • James Sands•8 CommentsUnion Pacific Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesUNP• Thu, Jul. 20, 9:10 AM • SA TranscriptsBurlington Stores Looks TemptingEditors' Pick • BURL• Thu, Jul. 20, 9:08 AM • Vince Martin•4 Comments123456...800Next Page









Access to this page has been denied.














Please verify you are a human





            Please click "I am not a robot" to continue
          



            Access to this page has been denied because we believe you are using automation tools to browse the website.
          

            This may happen as a result of the following:
          


              Javascript is disabled or blocked by an extension (ad blockers for example)
            

              Your browser does not support cookies
            


            Please make sure that Javascript and cookies are enabled on your browser and that you are not blocking them from loading.
          

            Reference ID: #2f6787b0-7078-11e7-8df8-a995417033ab
          





            Powered by
            PerimeterX
            , Inc.
          












Gracia C. Martore: Executive Profile & Biography - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 24, 2017 9:58 AM ET
Internet Software and Services

Company Overview of USA TODAY International Corporation



SnapshotPeople 




OverviewBoard MembersCommittees



Executive Profile
Gracia C. Martore  Chief Executive Officer of Gannett Co Inc and President of Gannett Co Inc, USA TODAY International CorporationAgeTotal Calculated CompensationThis person is connected to 6 Board Members in 6 different organizations across 10 different industries.See Board Relationships65--
Background

		Ms. Gracia C. Martore has been the President of Belo Corp. since December 23, 2013. Ms. Martore serves as the Chief Executive Officer and President of Gannett Co Inc. She served as the Chief Executive Officer of TEGNA Inc. from October 6, 2011 to May 31, 2017 and also served as its President from February 2010 to May 31, 2017, Chief Operating Officer from February 2010 to October 6, 2011, Chief Financial Officer from 2006 to November 2010, Executive Vice President from ... April 18, 2006 to 2010, Senior Vice President from 2003 to April 18, 2006, Senior Vice President of Finance from 2001 to 2002, Vice President and Treasury Services since 1993 and she was responsible for Investor Relations since 1995. She joined Gannett in 1985 as an Assistant Treasurer and served as its Treasurer & Vice President of Investor Relations since 1998. Ms. Martore held various leadership roles over her 30-year career. She worked for 12 years in the banking industry. She has been an Independent Director at WestRock Company since July 01, 2015. She has been a Director of United Rentals, Inc. since June 2, 2017 and Belo Corp. since December 23, 2013. She serves as a Director of Factory Mutual Insurance Company, FM Global and The Associated Press, Inc. Since October 2014, she has been a Trustee of The Paley Center for Media. She served as a Director of WestRock MWV, LLC since February 27, 2012 and TEGNA Inc. from October 6, 2011 to May 31, 2017. She served as a Director of Newsquest Capital Plc until June 29, 2015. She is a member of Wellesley College'sBoard of Trustees. She won numerous business and industry honors for her leadership. In 2012, 2013 and 2014, Ms. Martore was named as one of the “50 Most Powerful Women in Business” by Fortune Magazine. She was cited by Forbes in a review of the world’s most powerful women and in 2012, she was named to Forbes’ “100 Most Powerful Women” list. She also was named on Variety’s Women’s Impact List 2013 and one of Washington’s 100 Most Powerful Women by Washingtonian Magazine. Institutional Investor magazine named her as one of the best Chief Financial Officers in America and ranked her the Best Chief Financial Officer in America in the publishing and advertising agencies category from 2004 to 2006. The Washington Post also named she as one of the top 10 female executives at major companies in the Washington region. In 2006 she was named as Chief Financial Officer of the Year by Virginia Business. Ms. Martore received a B.A. in History and Political Science from Wellesley College, where she was named a Wellesley Scholar for academic excellence.Read Full Background




Corporate Headquarters
7950 Jones Branch DriveMcLean, Virginia 22108United StatesPhone: 703-854-3400Fax: 703-854-2049
Board Members Memberships
DirectorThe Associated Press, Inc.DirectorFactory Mutual Insurance Company2013-PresentPresident and DirectorBelo Corp.2015-PresentIndependent DirectorWestRock Company2017-PresentDirectorUnited Rentals, Inc.2017-PresentIndependent DirectorOmnicom Group Inc.
Education
BA Wellesley College
Other Affiliations
TEGNA Inc.WestRock CompanyUnited Rentals, Inc.Omnicom Group Inc.Belo Corp.WestRock MWV, LLCThe Associated Press, Inc.Newsquest Capital PlcWellesley CollegeFactory Mutual Insurance Company


Annual Compensation
				There is no Annual Compensation data available.
				Stocks Options
				There is no Stock Options data available.
				Total Compensation
				There is no Total Compensation data available.
			



Request Profile Update
















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



COMPETITOR COMPENSATIONThere is no Competitor Compensation data available.










Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact USA TODAY International Corporation, please visit .  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close





























Gracia Martore - Wikipedia



















 







Gracia Martore

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

Gracia C. Martore is the president and CEO of Tegna, Inc., and was CEO of the predecessor Gannett Company before its split. She replaced Craig Dubow on 6 October 2011.[1] She serves on the Board of Directors of FM Global and MeadWestvaco Corporation.
Education and early career
Martore graduated from Wellesley College in 1973 with a double major in history and political science. While at Wellesley she was named a Scholar for academic excellence.She worked for 12 years in the banking industry before joining Gannett. In 2010 Ms. Martore's total compensation was estimated by Forbes to be over eight million dollars.[2]
Awards
In a 2011 review of the world’s most powerful women Martore was cited by Forbes. She was also named one of Washington’s 100 Most Powerful Women by Washingtonian Magazine. Institutional Investor magazine named her one of the best CFOs in America and ranked her the Best CFO in America in the publishing and advertising agencies category for three years in a row (2004, 2005 and 2006). The Washington Post named her one of the top 10 female executives at major companies in the Washington region. In 2006 she was named CFO of the Year by Virginia Business.[3]
References

^ USA Today, 7 October 2011
^ Gracia Martore - Forbes
^ Leadership Team | Tegna.com



Preceded by
Craig Dubow
Gannett Corporation CEO
2011-2015
Succeeded by
Bob Dickey








v
t
e


Gannett Company



Directors:



Full list of directors





National assets



USA Today

The Big Lead
MMAjunkie.com
Sports Weekly














v
t
e


Gannett Company regional daily newspapers in the United States






Abilene Reporter-News
The Advocate
Anderson Independent-Mail
Alamogordo Daily News
Argus Leader
The Arizona Republic
Asbury Park Press
Asheville Citizen-Times
Battle Creek Enquirer
The Baxter Bulletin
The Burlington Free Press
Carlsbad Current-Argus
Chillicothe Gazette
The Cincinnati Enquirer
The Clarion-Ledger
Commercial Appeal
Corpus Christi Caller-Times
Coshocton Tribune
The Courier-Journal
Courier News
Courier-Post
The Daily Advertiser
The Daily Journal
The Daily News Journal
Daily Record
The Daily Times (Farmington)
The Daily Times (Salisbury)
Daily World
Deming Headlight
Democrat and Chronicle
The Des Moines Register
The Desert Sun
Detroit Free Press
El Paso Times
Evansville Courier & Press
The Evening Sun
Florida Today
Fort Collins Coloradoan
Fort Myers News-Press
Great Falls Tribune
Green Bay Press-Gazette
The Greenville News
Hattiesburg American
Henderson Gleaner
Herald Times Reporter
Home News Tribune
The Indianapolis Star
Iowa City Press-Citizen
The Ithaca Journal
The Jackson Sun
Journal & Courier
The Journal News
Kitsap Sun
Knoxville News Sentinel
Lancaster Eagle-Gazette
Lansing State Journal
Las Cruces Sun-News
The Leaf-Chronicle
Lebanon Daily News
Mansfield News Journal
The Marion Star
Marshfield News-Herald
Milwaukee Journal Sentinel

CNI Community Newspapers


Montgomery Advertiser
Naples Daily News
News Herald
The News Leader
The News Journal
The News-Messenger
The News-Star
Oshkosh Northwestern
Pacific Daily News
Palladium-Item
Pensacola News Journal
Port Huron Times Herald
The Post-Crescent
Poughkeepsie Journal
Press & Sun-Bulletin
Public Opinion
Redding Record Searchlight
Reno Gazette-Journal
The Reporter
St. Cloud Times
The Salinas Californian
San Angelo Standard-Times
The Sheboygan Press
Silver City Sun News
The Spectrum
Springfield News-Leader
Star-Gazette
The Star Press
Statesman Journal
Stevens Point Journal
Stuart News
Telegraph-Forum
The Tennessean
The Times
Times Herald
Times Record News
Times Recorder
The Town Talk
Treasure Coast Newspapers
Tulare Advance-Register
Ventura County Star
Vero Beach Press Journal
Visalia Times-Delta
Wausau Daily Herald
Wisconsin Rapids Daily Tribune
York Daily Record















v
t
e


Newsquest daily newspapers in the United Kingdom






The Argus, Brighton
The Bolton News
Telegraph & Argus, Bradford
Evening Gazette, Colchester
Bournemouth Daily Echo
Dorset Echo
Echo, Basildon, Essex
Evening Times
Greenock Telegraph
The Herald, Glasgow
News Shopper, South East London & North West Kent
Lancashire Telegraph
Oxford Mail
The National, Scotland
The Northern Echo
The Press, York
Southern Daily Echo, Southampton
South Wales Argus
Swindon Advertiser
Worcester News












This article about a chief executive from the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.


v
t
e









 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Gracia_Martore&oldid=789685835"					
Categories: Living peopleAmerican chairmen of corporations20th-century American businesspeopleAmerican media executivesAmerican corporate directorsAmerican chief financial officersGannett peopleAmerican women chief executivesWomen corporate directors21st-century American businesspeopleWellesley College alumniAmerican bankersWomen bankersWomen chief financial officersAmerican chief executive stubsHidden categories: Wikipedia indefinitely semi-protected biographies of living peopleAll stub articles 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
View source
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 8 July 2017, at 22:24.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Gracia Martore - Wikipedia



















 







Gracia Martore

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

Gracia C. Martore is the president and CEO of Tegna, Inc., and was CEO of the predecessor Gannett Company before its split. She replaced Craig Dubow on 6 October 2011.[1] She serves on the Board of Directors of FM Global and MeadWestvaco Corporation.
Education and early career
Martore graduated from Wellesley College in 1973 with a double major in history and political science. While at Wellesley she was named a Scholar for academic excellence.She worked for 12 years in the banking industry before joining Gannett. In 2010 Ms. Martore's total compensation was estimated by Forbes to be over eight million dollars.[2]
Awards
In a 2011 review of the world’s most powerful women Martore was cited by Forbes. She was also named one of Washington’s 100 Most Powerful Women by Washingtonian Magazine. Institutional Investor magazine named her one of the best CFOs in America and ranked her the Best CFO in America in the publishing and advertising agencies category for three years in a row (2004, 2005 and 2006). The Washington Post named her one of the top 10 female executives at major companies in the Washington region. In 2006 she was named CFO of the Year by Virginia Business.[3]
References

^ USA Today, 7 October 2011
^ Gracia Martore - Forbes
^ Leadership Team | Tegna.com



Preceded by
Craig Dubow
Gannett Corporation CEO
2011-2015
Succeeded by
Bob Dickey








v
t
e


Gannett Company



Directors:



Full list of directors





National assets



USA Today

The Big Lead
MMAjunkie.com
Sports Weekly














v
t
e


Gannett Company regional daily newspapers in the United States






Abilene Reporter-News
The Advocate
Anderson Independent-Mail
Alamogordo Daily News
Argus Leader
The Arizona Republic
Asbury Park Press
Asheville Citizen-Times
Battle Creek Enquirer
The Baxter Bulletin
The Burlington Free Press
Carlsbad Current-Argus
Chillicothe Gazette
The Cincinnati Enquirer
The Clarion-Ledger
Commercial Appeal
Corpus Christi Caller-Times
Coshocton Tribune
The Courier-Journal
Courier News
Courier-Post
The Daily Advertiser
The Daily Journal
The Daily News Journal
Daily Record
The Daily Times (Farmington)
The Daily Times (Salisbury)
Daily World
Deming Headlight
Democrat and Chronicle
The Des Moines Register
The Desert Sun
Detroit Free Press
El Paso Times
Evansville Courier & Press
The Evening Sun
Florida Today
Fort Collins Coloradoan
Fort Myers News-Press
Great Falls Tribune
Green Bay Press-Gazette
The Greenville News
Hattiesburg American
Henderson Gleaner
Herald Times Reporter
Home News Tribune
The Indianapolis Star
Iowa City Press-Citizen
The Ithaca Journal
The Jackson Sun
Journal & Courier
The Journal News
Kitsap Sun
Knoxville News Sentinel
Lancaster Eagle-Gazette
Lansing State Journal
Las Cruces Sun-News
The Leaf-Chronicle
Lebanon Daily News
Mansfield News Journal
The Marion Star
Marshfield News-Herald
Milwaukee Journal Sentinel

CNI Community Newspapers


Montgomery Advertiser
Naples Daily News
News Herald
The News Leader
The News Journal
The News-Messenger
The News-Star
Oshkosh Northwestern
Pacific Daily News
Palladium-Item
Pensacola News Journal
Port Huron Times Herald
The Post-Crescent
Poughkeepsie Journal
Press & Sun-Bulletin
Public Opinion
Redding Record Searchlight
Reno Gazette-Journal
The Reporter
St. Cloud Times
The Salinas Californian
San Angelo Standard-Times
The Sheboygan Press
Silver City Sun News
The Spectrum
Springfield News-Leader
Star-Gazette
The Star Press
Statesman Journal
Stevens Point Journal
Stuart News
Telegraph-Forum
The Tennessean
The Times
Times Herald
Times Record News
Times Recorder
The Town Talk
Treasure Coast Newspapers
Tulare Advance-Register
Ventura County Star
Vero Beach Press Journal
Visalia Times-Delta
Wausau Daily Herald
Wisconsin Rapids Daily Tribune
York Daily Record















v
t
e


Newsquest daily newspapers in the United Kingdom






The Argus, Brighton
The Bolton News
Telegraph & Argus, Bradford
Evening Gazette, Colchester
Bournemouth Daily Echo
Dorset Echo
Echo, Basildon, Essex
Evening Times
Greenock Telegraph
The Herald, Glasgow
News Shopper, South East London & North West Kent
Lancashire Telegraph
Oxford Mail
The National, Scotland
The Northern Echo
The Press, York
Southern Daily Echo, Southampton
South Wales Argus
Swindon Advertiser
Worcester News












This article about a chief executive from the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.


v
t
e









 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Gracia_Martore&oldid=789685835"					
Categories: Living peopleAmerican chairmen of corporations20th-century American businesspeopleAmerican media executivesAmerican corporate directorsAmerican chief financial officersGannett peopleAmerican women chief executivesWomen corporate directors21st-century American businesspeopleWellesley College alumniAmerican bankersWomen bankersWomen chief financial officersAmerican chief executive stubsHidden categories: Wikipedia indefinitely semi-protected biographies of living peopleAll stub articles 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
View source
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 8 July 2017, at 22:24.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 










Creative Commons — Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported
— CC BY-SA 3.0 






















Skip to content








 Menu















Help us build a vibrant, collaborative global commons
Donate Now














Creative Commons


Creative Commons License Deed







Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported

(CC BY-SA 3.0)








This is a human-readable summary of (and not a substitute for) the license.


Disclaimer.






You are free to:


Share — copy and redistribute the material in any medium or format


Adapt — remix, transform, and build upon the material


for any purpose, even commercially.

















The licensor cannot revoke these freedoms as long as you follow the license terms.




Under the following terms:



Attribution — You must give appropriate credit, provide a link to the license, and indicate if changes were made. You may do so in any reasonable manner, but not in any way that suggests the licensor endorses you or your use.




Attribute this work:












ShareAlike — If you remix, transform, or build upon the material, you must distribute your contributions under the same license as the original.








No additional restrictions — You may not apply legal terms or technological measures that legally restrict others from doing anything the license permits.






Notices:



You do not have to comply with the license for elements of the material in the public domain or where your use is permitted by an applicable exception or limitation.


No warranties are given. The license may not give you all of the permissions necessary for your intended use. For example, other rights such as publicity, privacy, or moral rights may limit how you use the material.








Learn more about CC licensing, or use the license for your own material.






This content is freely available under simple legal terms because of Creative Commons, a non-profit that survives on donations. If you love this content, and love that it's free for everyone, please consider a donation to support our work.
Make a Donation






This page is available in the following languages:


Castellano
Castellano (España)
Català
Dansk
Deutsch
English
Esperanto
français
Galego
hrvatski
Indonesia
Italiano
Latviski
Lietuvių
Melayu
Nederlands
Norsk
polski
Português
Português (BR)
română
Slovenščina
Suomeksi
svenska
Türkçe
íslenska
česky
Ελληνικά
Беларуская
русский
українська
العربية
پارسی
中文
日本語
華語 (台灣)
한국어






This content is freely available under simple legal terms because of Creative Commons, a non-profit that survives on donations. If you love this content, and love that it's free for everyone, please consider a donation to support our work.
When you share, everyone wins.





Contribute today to Creative Commons




$100



$50



$25



$5































Disclaimer

This deed highlights only some of the key features and terms of the actual license. It is not a license and has no legal value. You should carefully review all of the terms and conditions of the actual license before using the licensed material.
Creative Commons is not a law firm and does not provide legal services. Distributing, displaying, or linking to this deed or the license that it summarizes does not create a lawyer-client or any other relationship.




What does "Attribute this work" mean?


The page you came from contained embedded licensing metadata, including how the creator wishes to be attributed for re-use. You can use the HTML here to cite the work. Doing so will also include metadata on your page so that others can find the original work as well.




The applicable mediation rules will be designated in the copyright notice published with the work, or if none then in the request for mediation. Unless otherwise designated in a copyright notice attached to the work, the UNCITRAL Arbitration Rules apply to any arbitration.
More info.




If supplied, you must provide the name of the creator and attribution parties, a copyright notice, a license notice, a disclaimer notice, and a link to the material. CC licenses prior to Version 4.0 also require you to provide the title of the material if supplied, and may have other slight differences.
More info.




In 4.0, you must indicate if you modified the material and retain an indication of previous modifications. In 3.0 and earlier license versions, the indication of changes is only required if you create a derivative.
Marking guide.
More info.




You may also use a license listed as compatible at https://creativecommons.org/compatiblelicenses
More info.




A commercial use is one primarily intended for commercial advantage or monetary compensation.
More info.




Merely changing the format never creates a derivative.
More info.




The license prohibits application of effective technological measures, defined with reference to Article 11 of the WIPO Copyright Treaty.
More info.




The rights of users under exceptions and limitations, such as fair use and fair dealing, are not affected by the CC licenses.
More info.




You may need to get additional permissions before using the material as you intend.
More info.























Gracia Martore - Wikipedia



















 







Gracia Martore

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

Gracia C. Martore is the president and CEO of Tegna, Inc., and was CEO of the predecessor Gannett Company before its split. She replaced Craig Dubow on 6 October 2011.[1] She serves on the Board of Directors of FM Global and MeadWestvaco Corporation.
Education and early career
Martore graduated from Wellesley College in 1973 with a double major in history and political science. While at Wellesley she was named a Scholar for academic excellence.She worked for 12 years in the banking industry before joining Gannett. In 2010 Ms. Martore's total compensation was estimated by Forbes to be over eight million dollars.[2]
Awards
In a 2011 review of the world’s most powerful women Martore was cited by Forbes. She was also named one of Washington’s 100 Most Powerful Women by Washingtonian Magazine. Institutional Investor magazine named her one of the best CFOs in America and ranked her the Best CFO in America in the publishing and advertising agencies category for three years in a row (2004, 2005 and 2006). The Washington Post named her one of the top 10 female executives at major companies in the Washington region. In 2006 she was named CFO of the Year by Virginia Business.[3]
References

^ USA Today, 7 October 2011
^ Gracia Martore - Forbes
^ Leadership Team | Tegna.com



Preceded by
Craig Dubow
Gannett Corporation CEO
2011-2015
Succeeded by
Bob Dickey








v
t
e


Gannett Company



Directors:



Full list of directors





National assets



USA Today

The Big Lead
MMAjunkie.com
Sports Weekly














v
t
e


Gannett Company regional daily newspapers in the United States






Abilene Reporter-News
The Advocate
Anderson Independent-Mail
Alamogordo Daily News
Argus Leader
The Arizona Republic
Asbury Park Press
Asheville Citizen-Times
Battle Creek Enquirer
The Baxter Bulletin
The Burlington Free Press
Carlsbad Current-Argus
Chillicothe Gazette
The Cincinnati Enquirer
The Clarion-Ledger
Commercial Appeal
Corpus Christi Caller-Times
Coshocton Tribune
The Courier-Journal
Courier News
Courier-Post
The Daily Advertiser
The Daily Journal
The Daily News Journal
Daily Record
The Daily Times (Farmington)
The Daily Times (Salisbury)
Daily World
Deming Headlight
Democrat and Chronicle
The Des Moines Register
The Desert Sun
Detroit Free Press
El Paso Times
Evansville Courier & Press
The Evening Sun
Florida Today
Fort Collins Coloradoan
Fort Myers News-Press
Great Falls Tribune
Green Bay Press-Gazette
The Greenville News
Hattiesburg American
Henderson Gleaner
Herald Times Reporter
Home News Tribune
The Indianapolis Star
Iowa City Press-Citizen
The Ithaca Journal
The Jackson Sun
Journal & Courier
The Journal News
Kitsap Sun
Knoxville News Sentinel
Lancaster Eagle-Gazette
Lansing State Journal
Las Cruces Sun-News
The Leaf-Chronicle
Lebanon Daily News
Mansfield News Journal
The Marion Star
Marshfield News-Herald
Milwaukee Journal Sentinel

CNI Community Newspapers


Montgomery Advertiser
Naples Daily News
News Herald
The News Leader
The News Journal
The News-Messenger
The News-Star
Oshkosh Northwestern
Pacific Daily News
Palladium-Item
Pensacola News Journal
Port Huron Times Herald
The Post-Crescent
Poughkeepsie Journal
Press & Sun-Bulletin
Public Opinion
Redding Record Searchlight
Reno Gazette-Journal
The Reporter
St. Cloud Times
The Salinas Californian
San Angelo Standard-Times
The Sheboygan Press
Silver City Sun News
The Spectrum
Springfield News-Leader
Star-Gazette
The Star Press
Statesman Journal
Stevens Point Journal
Stuart News
Telegraph-Forum
The Tennessean
The Times
Times Herald
Times Record News
Times Recorder
The Town Talk
Treasure Coast Newspapers
Tulare Advance-Register
Ventura County Star
Vero Beach Press Journal
Visalia Times-Delta
Wausau Daily Herald
Wisconsin Rapids Daily Tribune
York Daily Record















v
t
e


Newsquest daily newspapers in the United Kingdom






The Argus, Brighton
The Bolton News
Telegraph & Argus, Bradford
Evening Gazette, Colchester
Bournemouth Daily Echo
Dorset Echo
Echo, Basildon, Essex
Evening Times
Greenock Telegraph
The Herald, Glasgow
News Shopper, South East London & North West Kent
Lancashire Telegraph
Oxford Mail
The National, Scotland
The Northern Echo
The Press, York
Southern Daily Echo, Southampton
South Wales Argus
Swindon Advertiser
Worcester News












This article about a chief executive from the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.


v
t
e









 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Gracia_Martore&oldid=789685835"					
Categories: Living peopleAmerican chairmen of corporations20th-century American businesspeopleAmerican media executivesAmerican corporate directorsAmerican chief financial officersGannett peopleAmerican women chief executivesWomen corporate directors21st-century American businesspeopleWellesley College alumniAmerican bankersWomen bankersWomen chief financial officersAmerican chief executive stubsHidden categories: Wikipedia indefinitely semi-protected biographies of living peopleAll stub articles 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
View source
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 8 July 2017, at 22:24.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Gracia Martore - Wikipedia



















 







Gracia Martore

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

Gracia C. Martore is the president and CEO of Tegna, Inc., and was CEO of the predecessor Gannett Company before its split. She replaced Craig Dubow on 6 October 2011.[1] She serves on the Board of Directors of FM Global and MeadWestvaco Corporation.
Education and early career
Martore graduated from Wellesley College in 1973 with a double major in history and political science. While at Wellesley she was named a Scholar for academic excellence.She worked for 12 years in the banking industry before joining Gannett. In 2010 Ms. Martore's total compensation was estimated by Forbes to be over eight million dollars.[2]
Awards
In a 2011 review of the world’s most powerful women Martore was cited by Forbes. She was also named one of Washington’s 100 Most Powerful Women by Washingtonian Magazine. Institutional Investor magazine named her one of the best CFOs in America and ranked her the Best CFO in America in the publishing and advertising agencies category for three years in a row (2004, 2005 and 2006). The Washington Post named her one of the top 10 female executives at major companies in the Washington region. In 2006 she was named CFO of the Year by Virginia Business.[3]
References

^ USA Today, 7 October 2011
^ Gracia Martore - Forbes
^ Leadership Team | Tegna.com



Preceded by
Craig Dubow
Gannett Corporation CEO
2011-2015
Succeeded by
Bob Dickey








v
t
e


Gannett Company



Directors:



Full list of directors





National assets



USA Today

The Big Lead
MMAjunkie.com
Sports Weekly














v
t
e


Gannett Company regional daily newspapers in the United States






Abilene Reporter-News
The Advocate
Anderson Independent-Mail
Alamogordo Daily News
Argus Leader
The Arizona Republic
Asbury Park Press
Asheville Citizen-Times
Battle Creek Enquirer
The Baxter Bulletin
The Burlington Free Press
Carlsbad Current-Argus
Chillicothe Gazette
The Cincinnati Enquirer
The Clarion-Ledger
Commercial Appeal
Corpus Christi Caller-Times
Coshocton Tribune
The Courier-Journal
Courier News
Courier-Post
The Daily Advertiser
The Daily Journal
The Daily News Journal
Daily Record
The Daily Times (Farmington)
The Daily Times (Salisbury)
Daily World
Deming Headlight
Democrat and Chronicle
The Des Moines Register
The Desert Sun
Detroit Free Press
El Paso Times
Evansville Courier & Press
The Evening Sun
Florida Today
Fort Collins Coloradoan
Fort Myers News-Press
Great Falls Tribune
Green Bay Press-Gazette
The Greenville News
Hattiesburg American
Henderson Gleaner
Herald Times Reporter
Home News Tribune
The Indianapolis Star
Iowa City Press-Citizen
The Ithaca Journal
The Jackson Sun
Journal & Courier
The Journal News
Kitsap Sun
Knoxville News Sentinel
Lancaster Eagle-Gazette
Lansing State Journal
Las Cruces Sun-News
The Leaf-Chronicle
Lebanon Daily News
Mansfield News Journal
The Marion Star
Marshfield News-Herald
Milwaukee Journal Sentinel

CNI Community Newspapers


Montgomery Advertiser
Naples Daily News
News Herald
The News Leader
The News Journal
The News-Messenger
The News-Star
Oshkosh Northwestern
Pacific Daily News
Palladium-Item
Pensacola News Journal
Port Huron Times Herald
The Post-Crescent
Poughkeepsie Journal
Press & Sun-Bulletin
Public Opinion
Redding Record Searchlight
Reno Gazette-Journal
The Reporter
St. Cloud Times
The Salinas Californian
San Angelo Standard-Times
The Sheboygan Press
Silver City Sun News
The Spectrum
Springfield News-Leader
Star-Gazette
The Star Press
Statesman Journal
Stevens Point Journal
Stuart News
Telegraph-Forum
The Tennessean
The Times
Times Herald
Times Record News
Times Recorder
The Town Talk
Treasure Coast Newspapers
Tulare Advance-Register
Ventura County Star
Vero Beach Press Journal
Visalia Times-Delta
Wausau Daily Herald
Wisconsin Rapids Daily Tribune
York Daily Record















v
t
e


Newsquest daily newspapers in the United Kingdom






The Argus, Brighton
The Bolton News
Telegraph & Argus, Bradford
Evening Gazette, Colchester
Bournemouth Daily Echo
Dorset Echo
Echo, Basildon, Essex
Evening Times
Greenock Telegraph
The Herald, Glasgow
News Shopper, South East London & North West Kent
Lancashire Telegraph
Oxford Mail
The National, Scotland
The Northern Echo
The Press, York
Southern Daily Echo, Southampton
South Wales Argus
Swindon Advertiser
Worcester News












This article about a chief executive from the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.


v
t
e









 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Gracia_Martore&oldid=789685835"					
Categories: Living peopleAmerican chairmen of corporations20th-century American businesspeopleAmerican media executivesAmerican corporate directorsAmerican chief financial officersGannett peopleAmerican women chief executivesWomen corporate directors21st-century American businesspeopleWellesley College alumniAmerican bankersWomen bankersWomen chief financial officersAmerican chief executive stubsHidden categories: Wikipedia indefinitely semi-protected biographies of living peopleAll stub articles 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
View source
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 8 July 2017, at 22:24.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 






Data Dumps  |  Freebase API (Deprecated)
       |  Google Developers
    
    
      
        Freebase API (Deprecated)
      
    
    
    All Products
  
  Sign in

  
  Send feedback
  





            Hey there! Are you maybe looking for Firebase instead?

            







    Data Dumps
  


The Freebase API will be completely shut-down on Aug 31 2016. This page provides access to the last available data dump. Read more.
Data Dumps are a downloadable version of the data in Freebase. They constitute a snapshot of the data stored in Freebase and the Schema that structures it, and are provided under the same CC-BY license. The Freebase/Wikidata mappings are provided under the CC0 license.

Freebase Triples
Freebase Deleted Triples
Freebase/Wikidata Mappings
License
Citing

Freebase Triples


This dataset contains every fact currently in Freebase.

Total triples: 1.9 billion
Updated: Weekly
Data Format: N-Triples RDF
License: CC-BY

22 GB gzip250 GB uncompressed

Download



The RDF data is serialized using the N-Triples format, encoded as UTF-8 text and compressed with Gzip.


RDF
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.date> "2001-02"^^<http://www.w3.org/2001/XMLSchema#gYearMonth>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.source> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11x1gf2m6>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/type.object.type> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.rate> 4.5 .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://www.w3.org/1999/02/22-rdf-syntax-ns#type> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage>  .


If you're writing your own code to parse the RDF dumps its often more efficient to read directly from GZip file rather than extracting the data first and then processing the uncompressed data.
<subject>  <predicate>  <object> .
Note: In Freebase, objects have MIDs that look like /m/012rkqx. In RDF those MIDs become m.012rkqx. Likewise, Freebase schema like /common/topic are written as common.topic.
The subject is the ID of a Freebase object. It can be a Freebase MID (ex. m.012rkqx) for topics and CVTs or a human-readable ID (ex. common.topic) for schema.
The predicate is always a human-readable ID for a Freebase property or a property from a standard RDF vocabulary like RDFS. Freebase foreign key namespaces are also used as predicates to make it easier to look up keys by namespace.
The object field may contain a Freebase MID for an object or a human-readable ID for schema from Freebase or other RDF vocabularies. It may also include literal values like strings, booleans and numeric values.
Topic descriptions often contain newlines. In order to make each triple fit on one line, we have escaped newlines with "\n".
Freebase Deleted Triples
We also provide a dump of triples that have been deleted from Freebase over time. This is a one-time dump through March 2013. In the future, we might consider providing periodic updates of recently deleted triples, but at the moment we have no specific timeframe for doing so, and are only providing this one-time dump. 

The dump is distributed as a .tar.gz file (2.1Gb compressed, 7.7Gb uncompressed). It contains 63,036,271 deleted triples in 20 files (there is no particular meaning to the individual files, it is just easier to manipulate several smaller files than one huge file).


Thanks to Chun How Tan and John Giannandrea for making this data release possible.




Total triples: 63 million
Updated: June 9, 2013
Data Format: CSV
License: CC-BY

2 GB gzip8 GB uncompressed

Download



The data format is essentially CSV with one important caveat. The object field may contain any characters, including commas (as well as any other reasonable delimiters you could think of). However, all the other fields are guaranteed not to contain commas, so the data can still be parsed unambiguously.

The columns in the dataset are defined as:

creation_timestamp (Unix epoch time in milliseconds)
creator
deletion_timestamp (Unix epoch time in milliseconds)
deletor
subject (MID)
predicate (MID)
object (MID/Literal)
language_code



CSV
1352854086000,/user/mwcl_wikipedia_en,1352855856000,/user/mwcl_wikipedia_en,/m/03r90,/type/object/key,/wikipedia/en/$B816,en
1355171076000,/user/mwcl_musicbrainz,1364258198000,/user/turtlewax_bot,/m/0nncp9z,/music/recording/artist,/m/01vbfm4,en
1176630380000,/user/mwcl_images,1335928144000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/029w57m,/common/image/size,/m/0kly56,en
1292854917000,/user/mwcl_musicbrainz,1364823418001,/user/mbz_pipeline_merge_bot,/m/0fv1vl8,/type/object/type,/common/topic,en
1205530905000,/user/mwcl_images,1336022041000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/01x5scz,/common/licensed_object/license,/m/02x6b,en
1302391361000,/user/content_administrator,1336190973000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/0gkb45y,/type/object/type,/type/content,en
1176728962002,/user/mwcl_images,1335954186000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/08430h,/common/topic/image,/m/02cs147,en
1172002568007,/user/mwcl_chefmoz,1283588560000,/user/delete_bot,/m/01z4c1z,/type/object/name,La Casa Rosa Mexican Restaurant,en


Freebase/Wikidata Mappings


The data has been created based on the Wikidata-Dump of October 28, 2013, and contains only those links that have at least two common Wikipedia-Links and not a single disagreeing Wikipedia-Link. Furthermore, the lines are sorted by the number of common Wikipedia-Links (although in Turtle this does not really matter).

Total triples: 2.1M
Updated: October 28, 2013
Data Format: N-Triples RDF
License: CC0

21.2 MB gzip242.9 MB uncompressed

Download



The RDF data is serialized using the N-Triples format, encoded as UTF-8 text and compressed with Gzip.


RDF
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0695j>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q6718> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.05nrg>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs7>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q538> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0jgd>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q414> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0d_23>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q2537> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.04g7d>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q315> .


License
Freebase Data Dumps are provided free of charge for any purpose with regular updates by Google. They are distributed, like Freebase itself, under the Creative Commons Attribution (aka CC-BY) and use is subject to the Terms of Service.
The Freebase/Wikidata ID mappings are provided under CC0 and can be used without restrictions.
Citing
If you'd like to cite these data dumps in a publication, you may use:

Google, Freebase Data Dumps, https://developers.google.com/freebase/data, <month> <day>, <year>

Or as BibTeX:


BibTex

@misc{freebase:datadumps,
  title = "Freebase Data Dumps"
  author = "Google",
  howpublished = "\url{https://developers.google.com/freebase/data}",
  edition = "<month> <day>, <year>",
  year = "<year>"
}




Except as otherwise noted, the content of this page is licensed under the Creative Commons Attribution 3.0 License, and code samples are licensed under the Apache 2.0 License. For details, see our Site Policies. Java is a registered trademark of Oracle and/or its affiliates.

      
      Last updated February 10, 2017.
    




Send feedback about...
          
          This page
        
            
            Documentation feedback
          
        Freebase API (Deprecated)
        
            
            Product feedback
          
        
        Cancel
      
